Foreign     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. II, No. 54, 
December 29, 1993 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   OCTOBER UNEMPLOYMENT FIGURES:  A total of 169,383 unemployed were 
registered in the Czech Republic on 31 October 1993, which 
represented an unemployment rate of 3.22 percent, compared with 3.17 
percent at the end of September.  In the course of October, labor 
offices in the Czech Republic registered 36,449 new job applicants 
and removed 34,029 persons from their records.  Recent school 
graduates represented 26,571 of the new job seekers; 1,282 of them 
were university graduates.  The number of reported vacancies 
declined from 65,800 at the end of September to 60,513 at the end of 
October.  Unemployment benefits were collected by 84,461 persons in 
October, and another 2,859 citizens were undergoing retraining. 
Regionally, the rate of unemployment ranged from 0.33 percent in 
Prague to 5.73 percent in north Moravia.  With 7.29 percent of the 
population out of work, Jicin in north Moravia was the district with 
the highest unemployment in the republic.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Czech 16 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   NINE-MONTH RETAIL SALES DATA:  According to preliminary Czech 
Statistical Office data, retail sales turnover in the first nine 
months of 1993 amounted to 305 billion Czech korunas (Kc), 24.4 
percent more than in the same period a year ago in nominal terms and 
3.6 percent more in real terms.  The private sector accounted for 77 
percent of retail trade turnover.  (Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 16 
Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SURVEY ON JOB PROSPECTS:  Over a quarter (28 percent) of working 
Czech citizens see their employer's prospects next year as very 
uncertain, according to a recent survey by the Institute for Public 
Opinion Research (IVVM).  However, only 2 percent of these believe 
that their employers will go bankrupt.  Forty percent said they 
believe the company for which they worked would manage to overcome 
problems although they would be large ones, while 27 percent believe 
that their companies will have no problems at all. 

   However, 60 percent of respondents viewed their personal 
prospects optimistically.  About a tenth were considering leaving 
their present jobs next year.  The percentage of people expecting to 
lose their jobs remained about the same as that shown in a similar 
survey in April, while the percentage of those who wanted to change 
their jobs had grown slightly.  The latter were most likely to be 
aged 29 and under.  People who worked for smaller private companies 
with up to 25 employees tended to see the future most 
optimistically.  The more education respondents had received, the 
better they judged their personal prospects in the company to be. 
Inhabitants of north Moravia expressed the least amount of 
confidence, with only 52 percent believing they would not lose their 
jobs.  Around a third of the 28 percent who saw the future of their 
company as very uncertain expressed interest in working abroad, and 
about a third of these were skilled workers.  The survey, conducted 
in October, questioned 534 working Czechs.  (Prague CTK in English 
16 Nov 93 AU) 

   CENTRAL BANK WANTS TO HOLD INFLATION BELOW 10 PERCENT:  Speaking 
in Znojmo, south Moravia, on 16 November, Czech National Bank (CNB) 
Governor Josef Tosovsky said that the bank intended to follow a 
monetary policy next year that would keep inflation below 10 
percent.  If inflation were slightly above 10 percent we would not 
consider it a catastrophe, Tosovsky added.  Besides measures the 
bank will take, there are several domestic factors that it cannot 
control, the governor noted.  These include wage developments, the 
inflow of foreign capital, and prices of raw materials, especially 
crude oil.  I would like to cast some doubt on the idea that one can 
definitely determine the rate of inflation in the Czech Republic, 
Tosovsky said.  (Prague CTK in English 16 Nov 93 AU) 

   PRIVATIZATION REVENUE:  Since its founding, the National Property 
Fund (FNM) has taken in Kc59.2 billion in revenue from large-scale 
privatization.  Of this, the FNM's income was Kc26.9 billion in 
1991-92 and Kc32.3 billion in the first nine months of 1993.  This 
is due to the gradual acceleration of the privatization process, FNM 
Chairman Tomas Jezek told the economic daily HOSPODARSKE NOVINY.  In 
the same period, the FNM spent Kc49.7 billion from its large- 
privatization account, most of it (Kc35 billion) to repay 
debentures.  Hence, the end-of-September 1993 net balance was Kc9.5 
billion.  Jezek expects proceeds from large-scale privatization to 
peak in 1994, when the FNM anticipates revenues of Kc4O billion. 
They will be spent to pay interest on the public debt (Kc18.3 
billion), to pay for the Ingolstadt-Kralupy oil pipeline (Kc5.1 
billion), to write off the debts of large companies prior to their 
privatization (Kc2.5 billion), to subsidize the Land Fund (Kc3.2 
billion), and to meet environmental commitments (Kc1 billion). 

   The FNM's small-scale privatization account shows aggregate 
revenues of Kc34.8 billion, of which only Kc3.8 billion have been 
taken in this year, Jezek said.  This is because small-scale 
privatization "is being wound down and can be considered closed." 
The bulk of proceeds from small-scale privatization is "blocked" for 
another four years.  Only Kc3.8 billion from the small-scale 
privatization account has been spent thus far to satisfy restitution 
claims, to liquidate state enterprises, and to fund the operation of 
district privatization commissions, so that Kc31 billion was left on 
the account on 30 September 1993.  Interest accrued on this account 
(worth Kc2.27 billion) has been used to subsidize interest rates in 
privatizing health care facilities.  The FNM's total assets reached 
Kc484 billion by 30 September, the bulk of which (Kc359 billion) 
consisted of securities, mainly shares from the first wave of coupon 
privatization.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 17 Nov 93 p 1 
AU) 

   IFC CREDIT FOR CAR-WHEEL MANUFACTURER:  On 15 November, the 
International Finance Corporation (IFC), a member of the World Bank 
group, approved a credit of DM63 million for the Autokola Nova Hut 
a.s., a car-wheel manufacturing joint venture set up by Nova Hut 
Ostrava (Ostrava New Steel Mill) and the U.S. Hayes Wheels 
International Company last year.  The credit will be used to finance 
the modernization and expansion of the company's production 
facilities.  The total cost of the project is DM104 million.  Part 
of the credit (DM27 million) will be provided by the IFC from its 
own resources, the remainder will be financed by a consortium of 
seven European and U.S. banks.  According to IFC Vice President W. 
Kaffenberger, the project deserves IFC support because, owing to low 
production costs and high quality, Czech car wheels are a highly 
competitive product.  Once the joint venture reaches full capacity, 
two-thirds of its output will be supplied to West European car- 
makers.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 17 Nov 93 p 2; Prague 
LIDOVE NOVINY FINANCNI NOVINY Supplement 17 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENT STATISTICS UPDATED:  According to Czech 
National Bank (CNB) data, Kc58.2 billion, that is, $2.078 billion, 
worth of foreign capital was invested in the Czech Republic in the 
form of direct investment between 1 January 1990 and 31 September 
1993.  Foreign capital has been invested mainly in the consumer 
goods and tobacco industry (26.3 percent), the automobile and 
vehicles industry (21.3 percent), the construction industry (13.2 
percent), the food industry (9.6 percent), and banking (9.3 
percent).  In terms of territorial structure, the most important 
investors have come from the FRG ($634 million, 31.3 percent); the 
United States ($590.2 million, 29.0 percent), France ($263.3 
million, 13.1 percent), Belgium (7.4 percent), and Austria (5.5 
percent).  In the first three quarters of this year, direct foreign 
investment in the Czech Republic reached the sum of $455 million, of 
which 54.5 percent has come from U.S. investors.  German investors 
account for only 10.6 percent of the foreign capital invested in the 
Czech Republic in the first three quarters of 1993.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 17 Nov 93 p 9; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 
in Czech 18 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   PRAGUE MUNICIPAL TRANSPORT FARES TO RISE:  On 16 November, the 
Prague City Council approved increases in municipal public transport 
fares as of 1 January 1994.  The price of a regular one-way ticket 
will go up from Kc4 to Kc6, the price of a monthly pass will go up 
from Kc20O to Kc280, and a yearly pass will cost Kc2,200 instead of 
Kc1,700.  Tickets for students and pensioners will also become more 
expensive.  Prague Mayor Jan Koukal expects the provide Dopravni 
Podnik, the municipal transport authority, with about Kc4OO million 
in additinal revenue next year.  The last increase in Prague public 
transport fares was in October 1992.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in 
Czech 17 Nov 93 p 1; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 18 Nov 93 p 3 
AU) 

   DUTY-FREE IMPORTS FOR JOINT VENTURES:  Under a new government 
decree, companies with foreign capital participation may import 
components and raw materials for their own production needs without 
paying customs duty, provided that these imports are offset by 
exports.  The decree applies to all branches of industry.  Companies 
asking for this customs exemption must have a foreign stake of at 
least 30 percent and Kc5O million.  The imported goods need not come 
from the foreign partner in the venture.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 
FINANCNI NOVINY Supplement in Czech 17 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   RENTERS' UNION ASKS FOR HEATING ALLOWANCES:  The Union for the 
Protection of Renters is demanding that government rental allowances 
also cover costs for heating and hot water, union chairman Stanislav 
Krecek said at a press conference on 17 November.  Krecek said that 
in Western Europe, 50 percent of renters receive housing allowances, 
and in some towns this figure is as high as 80 percent.  The 
difference between rental costs and the abilities of citizens to pay 
is too great, Krecek said, adding that this fact must be respected, 
even if allowances place a significant burden on the state budget. 
The union's principle criticism of the government bill on rental 
allowances is the fact that this appropriate does not cover heating 
and hot water.  Krecek noted that particularly people living in 
housing estates are not able to regulate the amount of heat they 
use.  He said that payments for heat and hot water constitute 52 
percent of the amount paid for rent by the average renter in the 
Czech Republic.  (Prague CTK in English 17 Nov 93 AU) 

   SALE OF SYNAGOGUE TO FOOD COMPANY PROTESTED:  Head of the north 
Bohemian Jewish community Chaim Klein aid he vehemently disagreed 
with the sale of the Zatec synagogue to the Milko company, which 
plans to use the building for selling hops.  The Jewish community 
sold the synagogue and an adjoining building to the Zatec Town 
Council in 1956, probably under duress, Klein believes.  He said he 
suspects the council wanted to sell the building before a law on the 
restitution of Jewish property is passed.  Klein quoted from the 
purchase agreement, which states that the synagogue was sold for 
Kc2.5 million, about $85,000, and Milko, a local food and real 
estate company, intends to use it for the sale of hops.  A municipal 
official responsible for property claimed, however, that the 
building would be used for cultural purposes and the new owner would 
consult the Jewish community on its future use.  (Prague CTK in 
English 17 Nov 93 AU) 

   STATE TV DEPENDENT ON INCOME FROM COMMERCIALS:  If the proposal 
by Council for Radio and Television Broadcasting regarding a ban on 
commercials in Czech Television is accepted, Czech Television as a 
public corporation would be liquidated, Czech Television Director 
General Ivo Mathe told CTK on 17 November.  The proposal was 
elaborated for the planned amendment to the Radio and Television 
Broadcasting Law.  We cannot do without the money from the 
commercials, which take up 1 percent of broadcasting time.  It 
amounts to one third of our income at present, Mathe said.  He noted 
that the 1 percent of commercials swallowed only 14 minutes of the 
24-hour television broadcasting.  This is a reason why Czech 
Television cannot compete with private TV companies regarding 
commercial broadcasting, Mathe explained.  (Prague CTK in English 17 
Nov 93 AU) 

   FOREIGN CURRENCY ALLOCATION RAISED:  The Czech National Bank 
(CNB) announced on 17 November that the amount of foreign exchange 
Czech citizens may legally exchange in banks will be raised to 
Kc12,0O0 korunas per year as of 1 January 1994.  When purchasing 
foreign currency, citizens will have to present their passports, in 
which the purchase will be noted.  Children under 15 will be able to 
purchase 50 percent of the full sum.  This year, citizens were 
allowed to purchase the equivalent of Kc7,500 of foreign exchange; 
the new allowance represents an increase of more than 55 percent. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 17 Nov 93 p 1; Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 18 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   MOST CZECHS BELIEVE INCOMES SHOULD NOT BE LIMITED:  The amount of 
money which can be made legally should be unlimited, according to 77 
percent of the respondents in a survey of 777 Czechs conducted by 
the Institute for Public Opinion Research (IVVM).  Only 11 percent 
of Czechs believe that legal incomes should be limited in some way. 
Ten percent said they did not know.  The opinion that legal incomes 
should not be limited was found most often amongst young people 
between the ages of 15 and 29 (84 percent), and people aged between 
30 and 44 (80 percent).  However, only 18 percent of pensioners 
believe that incomes should be unlimited. 

   People were also asked how they believed entrepreneurs made their 
money, with the IVVM offering seven possible ways.  Sixty eight 
percent of the respondents said they believed either the majority or 
almost all entrepreneurs in the same branch looked out for each 
other and did not allow prices to decrease, 17 percent believed that 
a minority or almost no entrepreneurs behaved in this way, 65 
percent of respondents believed that almost all or the majority of 
entrepreneurs looked for weak spots in the law and made use of them, 
while 25 percent believed that a minority or almost no entrepreneurs 
did so.  Sixty-four percent said that almost all or the majority 
worked long hours to the detriment of their families, and 26 percent 
thought a minority or almost no entrepreneurs overdid it in this 
respect.  Respondents viewed entrepreneurs' treatment of their 
competition more favorably, with 29 percent saying entrepreneurs 
liquidated the competition indiscriminately and 46 percent believing 
they did not. 

   However, respondents were not so kind in their assessment of 
entrepreneurs' indirect treatment of their customers.  Asked if 
entrepreneurs added only a reasonable amount of profit mark-up on to 
their prices, 24 percent said they did and 71 percent said they did 
not.  Twenty-three percent said entrepreneurs tried to find cheap 
and yet good quality goods for their customers, and 67 percent said 
they did not.  Only 12 percent were unkind enough to say that most 
or almost all entrepreneurs knowingly falsified documents, with 41 
percent believing that this was done only by a minority or by almost 
no entrepreneurs.  (Prague CTK in English 18 Nov 93 AU) 

   PRIVATE LAND OWNERSHIP:  A total of 76 percent of the 4.2 million 
hectares of agricultural land in the Czech Republic is administered 
by the private sector, while only 24 percent remains in state 
ownership.  Some 740,000 hectares are owned by family farms, while 
56 percent is owned by various companies.  This was stated by 
Minister of Agriculture Josef Lux at a news conference in Zlin on 18 
November.  According to Lux, about one-half of the 600,000 people 
who used to work in agriculture have left for other branches of the 
economy and the agricultural labor force is expected to shrink by 
another 50,000 people.  "Transformation of agriculture has thereby 
surpassed transformation of industry," Lux claimed.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 19 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   CZECH, DUTCH TRANSPORT MINISTERS DISCUSS CIVIL AVIATION:  Dutch 
and Czech Transport Ministers Hanja Maij-Weggen and Jan Strasky 
acquainted each other with the transport situation in the two 
countries, the Czech Transport Ministry's press official Pavel Kavka 
told CTK on 18 November.  The talks focused on civil aviation, Kavka 
reported.  Strasky pointed to the unbalanced air connection between 
Prague and Amsterdam.  While the Czech contractor runs 9 lines, his 
Dutch counterpart runs 14 lines.  A better situation is in truck 
transport where the trade exchange is carried out by about the same 
number of trucks from both countries, Strasky said.  The Dutch 
Government delegation was accompanied on its one-day visit by 
representatives of the Dutch trade circles, especially in the sphere 
of transport and telecommunications, who had conducted talks with 
representatives of the Czech Railways and the Czech Airport 
Management.  (Prague CTK in English 18 Nov 93 AU) 

   TRADE, CULTURAL CENTER OPENS IN TAIWAN:  The Czech Economic and 
Cultural Office started activities in the capital of Taiwan, Taipei, 
on 18 November, the spokesman for the Skoda Group of Plzen, Jaroslav 
Hudec, told CTK.  The office is a nongovernment organization aimed 
at the development of economic, especially trade, relations between 
the two countries.  The joint-stock companies Skoda Plzen and 
Strojimport played an important role in its founding.  It is to 
become a basis for the supply of Skoda's products to Taiwan and 
neighboring areas.  The office is expected to help establish trade 
relations in the territory for other Czech firms as well.  It has 
also been entrusted by the Czech Foreign Ministry to deal with visa 
and consular affairs.  Skoda Plzen in the future intends to build 
other trade centers that would allow it to penetrate new world 
markets, for instance in southeast Asia and Latin America.  It wants 
to open a business office in Rio de Janeiro in January, and later on 
in Brussels and the Baltic countries.  It would also like to expand 
its representation in Moscow.  (Prague CTK in English 18 Nov 93 AU) 

   CZECH-GERMAN CHAMBER OF COMMERCE OPENS:  The constituent assembly 
of the German-Czech Chamber of Industry and Commerce took place in 
Prague on 19 November.  The chamber, whose aim is to expand economic 
ties between the two countries, is taking over the tasks of the 
trade mission at the FRG Embassy.  Even though its activity is only 
starting, the chamber already has 191 members.  This year, Germany 
has overtaken Slovakia as the Czech Republic's most important 
trading partner, accounting for 27 percent of the Czech Republic's 
exports and 25 percent of its imports.  With a share of 34 percent, 
the FRG is also the most important foreign investor in the Czech 
Republic.  Since 1990, German investments in the Czech Republic have 
reached the sum of almost Kc60 billion.  According to the experts of 
six German economic institutes, the Czech Republic is the only post- 
communist country that has managed to increase its exports this 
year.  German experts also expect the Czech Republic to be the only 
post-communist country to achieve growth of gross national product 
in 1994.  Carl H. Hahn, former president of Volkswagen, has become 
president of the German-Czech Chamber of Industry and Commerce, 
Juergen Moellering is its executive director.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 
in Czech 20 Nov 93 p 3; Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 22 Nov 
93 p 4 AU) 

   MINISTER VIEWS PETROCHEMICAL INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATON:  Czech Trade 
and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy expressed disappointment over 
the slow pace of privatization of petrochemical companies.  Speaking 
at an extraordinary meeting of the Czech Association of 
Petrochemical Industry on 19 November Dlouhy gave the reason as the 
need for a solution to the sensitive issue of separating refineries 
from petrochemical complexes.  The ministry decided that 
privatization of the petrochemical giants Chemopetrol Litvinov and 
Kaucuk Kralupy -- both of which are to be transformed into joint- 
stock companies -- must exclude the plants' refineries.  The 
companies' directors are not enthusiastic about such a measure. 
They have been looking for ways to include the remaining parts of 
their existing companies into the privatized entities.  According to 
approved privatization projects, the state will control 38 percent 
of shares in Chemopetrol Litvinov, 26 percent in Kaucuk Kralupy, and 
23 percent in Paramo Pardubice, another large petrochemical 
producer.  A significant portion of the shares will be offered for 
direct sale to a previously chosen party, the minister noted. 
Privatization of the state-owned Benzina will also be an important 
step in the petrochemical industry, Dlouhy pointed out, adding that 
the gasoline refinery and distributor is to be divided into three 
companies. 

   Some 230 gasoline stations will remain in the ownership of the 
remaining, unprivatized part of Benzina, to be gradually sold off 
directly.  It is estimated that 320,000 tons of crude oil products 
were illegally imported to the Czech Republic from less developed 
countries in the first eight months of the year, Dlouhy also said at 
the meeting.  The ministry considers introducing an anti-dumping law 
or other protective mechanism necessary, he stressed.  Czech 
authorities want to eliminate the problem by specially marking those 
petroleum products meant for use as boiler fuel.  Refineries are to 
introduce the system on a trial basis January 1, 1994.  The ministry 
also plans to cooperate with Slovak authorities under the joint 
customs union procedures it has in place with that country to create 
legislation which would place heavy sanctions on entities misusing 
crude oil products.  (Prague CTK in English 19 Nov 93 AU) 

   GASOLINE PRICE TO BE DEREGULATED:  The price of gasoline and 
diesel fuel will probably increase twice early in 1994.  The first 
increase, by approximately KcO.60 to Kc0.70 per liter, will be a 
result of the amended law on consumer taxes and will make itself 
felt as of 1 January.  The second increase will be due to the 
abolition of fuel price ceilings as of February.  The intention to 
deregulate fuel prices as of February was announced by Jana 
Fuerstova, head of the price department at the Ministry of Finance, 
at the annual meeting of the Association of Petroleum Industry and 
Trade on 19 November.  A representative of the Aral company 
estimated that the deregulation would raise of gasoline prices by 
another Kc0.50 per liter.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 20 Nov 
93 p 1 AU) 

   SALARY INCREASES FOR CIVIL SERVANTS:  The salaries of the 
approximately 560,000 employees of budget-funded organizations will 
be raised as of 1 December 1993, by between 5 and 23 percent, 
Minister of Labor and Social Affairs Jindrich Vodicka announced in 
Prague on 19 November.  Salaries in the higher wage scales will be 
raised more markedly than in the lower wage scales to reward people 
performing "more demanding and more responsible jobs."  Vodicka 
explained that the rise was made necessary by the widening gap 
between incomes in the budget-funded sphere, where salaries are 
expected to increase 20 percent this year, and in self-financed 
economic organizations where salaries will have increased 27 percent 
by the end of the year.  In December alone, the salary increases 
will cause additional expenditures of Kc300 million.  (Prague LIDOVE 
NOVINY in Czech 20 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   OIL REFINER TO BUILD GAS-STATION CHAIN:  The Kaucuk Kralupy 
petrochemical company, which operates one of the two oil refineries 
in the Czech Republic, has decided to build its own network of gas 
stations.  Its first gas station, built at a cost of Kc30 million, 
was put into operation in Kralupy on 18 November.  Two more gas 
stations, at Humpolec and Melnik, will be opened by the end of the 
year and another 10 new gas stations will be built in 1994.  The 
company claims that, because it is in charge of both production and 
distribution, it will be able to sell all types of fuel for about 
Kc0.30 less (per liter) than its competitors.  (Prague CESKY DENIK 
in Czech 20 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   ONLY SMALL CONSTRUCTION FIRMS REPORT GROWTH:  The Czech 
Statistical Office reports that Czech construction firms' output in 
January-September 1993 reached the value of Kc84.384 billion, 19 
percent more than in the same period a year ago.  In real terms, 
however, construction output dropped more than four percent.  Small 
firms alone reached a real growth of 2.6 percent, however.  The 
value of construction projects carried out abroad dropped by almost 
one-third compared with the first three quarters in 1992.  (Prague 
CESKY DENIK in Czech 20 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   FARM PRODUCT PRICES:  Agricultural producer prices increased 9.6 
percent in the first 10 months of 1993, compared with the same 
period in 1992.  While the prices of products of animal origin 
increased 4.6 percent, prices in crop farming increased 16.8 
percent.  This was announced by the Czech Statistical Office on 19 
November.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 20 Nov 93 p 4 AU) 

   TRANSFORMATION OF COOPERATIVE FARMS:  According to the latest 
Ministry of Agriculture statistics, the 1,205 agricultural 
cooperatives in the Czech Republic have been transformed into 1,658 
new cooperatives and other companies.  Their average size has been 
reduced from the original 2,100 hectares to 1,408 hectares.  The 
number of employees of agricultural cooperatives has been cut by 
almost 17 percent since the beginning of 1993.  Cooperatives have 
already settled two-thirds (Kc12.68 billion) of the relatively high 
volume of restitution claims (Kc19.044 billion).  Agricultural 
cooperatives continue to operate at a loss.  In the first half of 
1993, the aggregate loss of all enterprises of primary agricultural 
production amounted to Kc9.425 billion, which was Kc380 million more 
than in the first half of 1992.  Cooperatives account for 60 to 70 
percent of this aggregate loss.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 
22 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SKODA PRAGUE BUYS WESTINGHOUSE SYSTEM:  On 19 November, the 
Westinghouse Electric Corporation informed the economic daily 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY that it had obtained from the Skoda Prague 
company a $3.6 million order for the supply of a digital control 
system for the EME II electric power station in Melnik.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 22 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   GROWING CZECH-UKRAINIAN TRADE:  The Czech Republic imported 
Kc2.45 billion worth of goods from Ukraine in the first three 
quarters of 1993, while the volume of Czech exports to Ukraine 
reached Kc1.97 billion, Jan Hronik of the Ministry of Industry and 
Trade told the economic daily HOSPODARSKE NOVINY.  Hronik considers 
this result a "relative success," in view of the fact that no trade 
agreement between the two countries has been concluded this year. 
In the same period in 1992, the Czech-Ukrainian trade turnover 
amounted to only Kc4.1 billion, despite the existence of a Czech- 
Ukrainian trade agreement.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 22 
Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN COMPANY TO ACQUIRE CONTROL OF SUGAR REFINERY:  The 
Hrusovany sugar refinery, one of the oldest in the Czech Republic, 
has become the second sugar refinery in the country -- after 
Dobrovice -- with a foreign ownership stake.  The Austrian Agrana 
Beteiligungs AG Wien has acquired 8 percent of the sugar refinery's 
shares and intends to increase its share to 51 percent next year. 
Agrana's representative Manfred Rieff has already assumed a seat on 
the company's board.  Frantisek Gerza, director general of the 
Hrusovany sugar refinery, considers Agrana's interest a great 
success because it is taking place at a time when the Czech sugar 
industry is undergoing a "deep crisis" caused by excess production. 
The Hrusovany sugar refinery, which employs about 400 people, will 
process about 290,000 tons of sugar beet and produce about 35,000 
tons of sugar this year.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY BURZOVNI NOVINY 
Supplement in Czech 22 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   AGING POPULATION:  The age composition of the Czech Republic's 
population will "drastically deteriorate" at the beginning of the 
21st century.  The population will be decreasing by up to 30,000 a 
year, the average age will go up, and the birth rate will go down. 
The proportion of the population of working age, which is now 60 
percent (6.201 million people), will drop to 57.7 percent (5.824 
million) by the year 2020.  Only a relatively high level of 
migration could alter this negative trend.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY KARIERA Supplement in Czech 22 Nov 93 p 8 AU) 

   SUBSISTENCE INCOME TO INCREASE:  The subsistence level in the 
Czech Republic is to be increased by 10 percent as of January 1, 
1994, Czech cabinet ministers decided at their meeting on 23 
November.  The current subsistence level is Kc1,960 ($70) monthly. 
The increase must still be approved by the government, Economics 
Minister Karel Dyba told journalists.  (Prague CTK in English 23 Nov 
93 AU) 

   PHASE-OUT OF FEDERAL COINS:  November 30, 1993, will be the last 
day on which the only remaining coins issued by the Czechoslovak 
Federation -- the 2-crown and the 5-crown coins -- will be still 
valid, spokesman for the Czech National Bank (CNB) Martin Svehla 
told CTK on 22 November.  After that date, these coins will only be 
exchangeable at banks dedicated to currency operations until March 
31, 1994, he added.  November 30 will also be the deadline for 
exchanging federal 10-heller, 20-heller, 50-heller, and 10-crown 
coins, and 10-crown, 20-crown, and 50-crown banknotes, which expired 
on July 1, 1993.  Shops and enterprises can still include the 
federal 2-crown and 5-crown federal coins when turning their 
receipts over to the Czech Post, Komercni Banka, or the Czech 
Savings Bank, until December 10, 1993.  Entrepreneurs will thus be 
able to accept such coins from the customers until then, Svehla 
said.  (Prague CTK in English 23 Nov 93 AU) 

   PORSCHE COMPONENTS FROM KRUMLOV:  After several months of 
negotiations, the Porsche company acquired 100 percent of the shares 
of Jipo Cesky Krumlov, originally a joint venture set up by Porsche 
and Jihostroj Velesin, a manufacturer of components for the aircraft 
industry.  Jipo is to take over the bulk of production from 
Porsche's division in Salzburg, Austria.  It will switch from the 
production of aircraft components to the production of precision 
parts for Porsche automobiles, such as "movable" engine and gearbox 
parts, gear wheels, and shafts.  Jipo's turnover is to increase from 
Kc60 million this year to Kc250 million in 1994.  The workforce is 
to be increased from 35 to 60.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 
23 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SLIGHT INCREASE IN PRODUCER PRICES IN OCTOBER:  Industrial 
producer prices increased only 0.6 percent in October, compared with 
September, the Czech Statistical Office announced.  Since the 
beginning of the year, industrial producer prices increased 11.6 
percent.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 23 Nov 93 p 9 AU) 

   AIRCRAFT COMPANIES TO BE SOLD IN PUBLIC TENDER:  According to 
Zdenek Burian, press spokesman of AERO Holding, a public tender will 
soon be held for the sale of a majority stake in Let Kunovice a.s., 
a manufacturer of transport aircraft.  This is the second Czech 
aircraft equipment producer, the first being Motorlet Prague, to be 
sold within a short period of time.  The reason for the sale of the 
two companies is their "dire financial situation," caused by the 
collapse of the eastern markets and the recession on western 
markets.  Motorlet lost Kc474 million last year and Let Kunovice 
Kc235 million.  This year's losses are expected to be even greater. 
(Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 24 Nov 94 p 6 AU) 

   CANADIANS TO BUILD SKATE FACTORY:  The Canadian Cans tar Sports 
company, one of the world's major producers of skates and ice hockey 
gear, announced on 23 November its intention to build in Zdar nad 
Sazavou a Kc25O-million (10-million-Canadian-dollar) plant for the 
production of skates.  The Czech Republic is to become the basis for 
the Canadian company's expansion to Eastern and West European 
markets.  Some 80 percent of the factory's output is to be exported. 
Gordon Halliday, vice president of Canstar Sports, said that the 
30,0O0-square-meter factory would be completed in October 1994 and 
provide 225 jobs.  Cans tar reckons with Czech suppliers' heavy 
involvement; the Botana shoe factory should be the most important 
supplier.  In its first year of operation, the company is to reach a 
turnover of 5 million Canadian dollars.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in 
Czech 24 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   FUEL FRAUD COSTS STATE BILLIONS:  According to the Prague daily 
MLADA FRONTA DNES, some 320,000 tons of heating oil have been 
illegally imported to the Czech Republic in the first eight months 
of the year, mostly from Ukraine and Poland, and sold as diesel fuel 
at a profit.  Because of this fraud, the state has lost over Kc2.5 
billion in taxes (as no consumer tax is levied on heating oil and 
because the VAT on heating oil is 5 percent and the VAT on diesel 
fuel 23 percent).  As the two substances are practically 
undistinguishable, the fraud is difficult to prevent.  One 
indication of the scale of this fraud is the declining sales of 
diesel fuel in the Czech Republic.  Benzina, the former monopoly 
distributor of motor fuels, sold 1,800,000 tons of diesel fuel in 
1991, 1,400,000 tons in 1992, but expects to sell only 850,000 tons 
this year.  The daily notes that, as a first measure against this 
tax evasion, Czech refineries will start in January to mark and 
paint oil products on an experimental basis.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES in Czech 24 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   SHRINKING BUDGET SURPLUS:  The state budget surplus has dropped 
from Kc5 billion at the end of October to Kc2.8 billion in late 
November, Finance Minister Ivan Kocarnik told students during a 
discussion at the Prague Economic College on 23 November.  (Prague 
MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 24 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   JANUARY-OCTOBER FOREIGN TRADE STATISTICS:  The Czech Republic's 
foreign trade turnover, excluding that with Slovakia, grew 16 
percent in the first 10 months of the year, compared with the same 
period last year, according to figures obtained by CTK from the 
Czech Statistics Office on 25 November.  Imports increased by 16.8 
percent and exports by 15.3 percent.  Imports rose from all 
countries with the exception of those of the former Soviet Union. 
Imports from these countries have been falling continuously, the 
decline amounting to 12 percent.  Exports have also grown to all 
countries with the exception of those to the former USSR, where the 
volume dropped by 6.4 percent.  Exports to European countries going 
through economic reforms fell by 16.4 percent. 

   The foreign trade balance including Slovakia reached a surplus of 
5.3 billion crowns between January and September.  Surpluses were 
achieved in trade with states of the European Union (10.4 billion 
crowns), the developing countries (12.4 billion crowns), European 
countries undergoing reforms without the former USSR (6.6 billion 
crowns), and countries with state-controlled trade (6 billion 
crowns).  A deficit was scored in trade with countries of the 
European Free Trade Association (8.9 billion crowns), other advanced 
countries with market economies (8.3 billion crowns), and with 
countries of the former USSR (19.9 billion crowns).  In the first 
nine months of this year the foreign trade surplus turned into a 
deficit of 1.8 billion crowns.  Trade with Slovakia scored a surplus 
of 7.1 billion crowns.  Slovakia accounted for 19.3 percent of the 
overall foreign trade turnover, countries with an advanced market 
economy for 57.2 percent (European Union countries for 42.3 
percent), countries of the former USSR for 9.1 percent, developing 
countries for 6.8 percent, European countries undergoing reforms 6 
percent and countries with a state-run trade 1.6 percent.  (Prague 
CTK in English 25 Nov 93 AU) 

   BAVARIANS RAISE OBJECTIONS TO CZECH-GERMAN PIPELINE:  Some 400 
German individual and collective reservations against the oil 
pipeline from Ingolstadt to Kralupy nad Vltavou, north Bohemia, have 
been registered by the Bavarian Labor Ministry, Reinhard Schug, the 
ministry's official responsible for the project, told CTK on 25 
November.  The reservations concern the security of the pipeline, 
and water and environment protection, Schug added.  The pipeline, to 
be completed in 1995, is to relieve Czech dependence on the only oil 
pipeline connecting the Czech Republic with Russia.  Central oil- 
storage tanks at Nelahozeves in the Czech Republic and Wollburg in 
Germany are currently under construction.  (Prague CTK in English 25 
Nov 93 AU) 

   INVESTMENT FUNDS:  A total of 353 funds registered for the second 
privatization wave by 23 November, 196 of which are investment funds 
and 157 mutual funds.  About 100 of the registered funds took part 
in the first privatization wave.  Funds that did not register by the 
23 November deadline will not be able to participate in the second 
privatization wave.  The final number could still be reduced 
following a Finance Ministry review.  A total of 264 funds had taken 
part in the first privatization wave in the Czech Republic, 218 of 
which still exist (46 weaker funds have merged with stronger ones). 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 17 Nov 93 p 14; Prague MLADA 
FRONTA DNES in Czech 25 Nov 94 p 14 AU) 

   HUNGARIANS BUY PRAGUE BANK:  A consortium of Hungarian banks 
under the management of Magyar Hi tel Bank (MHB) and the Elso Hazai 
Faktorhaz company has acquired 98 percent of Interbanka Prague 
shares.  The shares have until now been held by the Swiss Portus 
Cham company.  The change in ownership is expected to shift the 
focus of Interbanka's activities toward financing Czech-Slovak- 
Hungarian trade.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 25 Nov 93 p 14 
AU) 

   ZPS ZLIN SETS UP JOINT VENTURES IN PRC:  The ZPS (Precision 
Engineering Works) Zlin a.s. and the China Shonyang City First 
Factory have signed in the PRC an agreement on establishing a joint 
venture for the production of machine tools.  The joint venture will 
make machine tools for the production of hydraulic valves for the 
Chinese market.  This joint venture has increased the number of 
ZPS's joint ventures in China to five.  The other four have been set 
up by ZPS-Shoe Machines, a ZPS subsidiary specializing in the 
production of footwear machinery.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 25 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   DECLINE IN AGRICULTURAL SUBSIDIES:  The share of agricultural and 
food subsidies in budget expenditures has declined from 18.21 
percent in 1989 to 2.65 percent this year, which represents a 
sevenfold decrease.  This year, Kc8.1 billion will be spent to 
subsidize agriculture and food exports, compared with Kc30 billion 
in 1989.  In 1995, the level of subsidies is to decrease further, to 
Kc4.8 billion.  The above data is included in the "Basic Principles 
of Agricultural Policy of the Czech Republic Government in 1995," a 
document that Agriculture Minister Lux has submitted to the Czech 
Government for approval.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 25 Nov 93 p 8 
AU) 

   DISTRIBUTION OF PHARMACEUTICALS IN FOREIGN HANDS:  According to 
Engineer J. Michal, director general of the Leciva a.s., over 300 
pharmaceuticals distribution companies operate in the Czech Republic 
at present, 80 percent of which are foreign-owned.  Michal says that 
most of these companies have "capital links" with foreign 
pharmaceuticals companies, which explains their preference for 
expensive imported drugs.  Michal claims that there have even been 
cases of distributors buying up inexpensive Czech and Slovak drugs 
and holding them back so that doctors would be forced to prescribe 
expensive imported drugs.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 26 Nov 93 
p 1 AU) 

   NEW GLASS FACTORY:  A new production plant of the Glavunion 
Teplice company was put into operation at Kryry on 24 November.  The 
new plant will produce 1 million square meters of mirrors and 
900,000 square meters of "furniture glass" annually, which will make 
it one of the largest European mirror factories.  The construction 
costs amounted to almost Kc500 million.  The plant employs 140 
people.  Following the construction of another production hall in 
1995-96, the plant's capacity will double.  Glavunion is a joint 
venture set up by Sklounion Teplice and the Belgian Glaverbel 
company (67 percent), whose distribution network will secure the 
marketing of glass from Kryry.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 26 Nov 
93 p 8 AU) 

   PERMIT ISSUED FOR CZECH PORTION OF OIL PIPELINE:  The building 
permit for the entire Czech part of the Ingolstadt-Kralupy nad 
Vltavou oil pipeline was issued by the Tachov District Office in the 
first week of November.  Construction of the pipeline, whose Czech 
section measures 165,340 meters, is expected to start in March 1994. 
Although the pipelines cross 6,000 land parcels on Czech territory, 
only 1,430 square meters of land will have to be bought from their 
owners because the pipeline will be laid mostly underground.  Most 
parcels will thus be returned to the owners once construction is 
completed.  They will not be permitted to erect any buildings on 
them, however.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 9 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   ABB BUYS ELEKTRO-PRAGA:  The Zurich-based Asea Brown Boveri (ABB) 
concern has purchased from the National Property Fund the Elektro- 
Praga Jablonec company, the leading manufacturer of electric 
fixtures in the Czech Republic.  The new name of the company, which 
is 100-percent owned by ABB, is ABB Busch-Jaeger Elektro-Praga Ltd. 
ABB bought the company for Kc280 million, its book value.  It 
pledged, however, to invest another 9 million German marks (Kc153 
million) within the next two years and to retain the 1,170 present 
employees.  Based on the purchase contract, ABB must also reinvest 
75 percent of all profits made in 1998-99.  ABB now owns six 
companies with over 7,000 employees in the Czech Republic.  (Prague 
RUDE PRAVO in Czech 9 Nov 93 p 8; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 
10 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   NEW K-MART STORE:  The renovated Prior department store in Brno 
was officially reopened on 8 November, under the name K-Mart.  It is 
the U.S. company's sixth department store in the Czech Republic -- 
af ter Hradec Kralove, Plzen, Liberec, Pardubice, and Prague. 
(Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 9 Nov 93 p 8 AU) 

   CONSORTIUM WANTS TO PURCHASE MINES IN AUSTRALIA:  A consortium 
that includes two Czech investors -- Ceskomoravske Doly Kladno 
(Czech-Moravian Mines Kladno, CMD) and Metalimex Prague -- is 
interested in purchasing coal mines in the Hunter Valley near the 
port of New Castle on the Australian east coast, Viktor Kolacek, 
president of the CMD Board of Directors, told the Prague daily RUDE 
PRAVO after returning from Australia.  According to Kolacek, the 
excellent infrastructure and open-pit mining make it possible to 
extract coal in the Hunter Valley at one-sixth to one-seventh of 
German costs.  The Czech investors are interested in mines with an 
annual capacity of 2.5 to 4 million tons of bituminous coal, while 
annual bituminous coal production in the entire Hunter Valley 
amounts to 45 million tons.  By comparison, some 12.7 million tons 
of bituminous coal were extracted in the Czech Republic in the first 
eight months of 1993.  The present owner, the Hunter Valley Coal 
Corporation, is to decide on the sale "in the nearest future." 
(Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 9 Nov 93 p 8 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL DECLINE CONTINUED IN SEPTEMBER:  Industrial output in 
current prices was 5 percent higher in September than in the same 
month a year ago, but it declined 5.5 percent when using comparable 
prices.  The output of the building industry increased 25.6 percent 
in current prices and 1.9 percent in comparable prices.  The 
physical volume of industrial output for January-September 1993 was 
5.2 percent lower than in the first three-quarters of 1992.  The 
physical construction volume in the first three-quarters of 1993 was 
4.1 percent lower than in the same period a year ago.  These 
figures, which were released by the Czech Statistical Office on 9 
November, include estimates for small companies with fewer than 25 
employees.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 10 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   'MINIMAL' INTEREST IN CKD LOCOMOTIVES:  The CKD Prague 
stockholding company has manufactured only about 30 locomotives this 
year, most of them for customers in Ukraine and other CIS republics, 
according to a 9 November statement by CKD Press Spokesman Frantisek 
Rousek.  Compared with the former annual production of about 500 
locomotives, interest in CKD locomotives is "minimal," Rousek said. 
The last major delivery of 200 locomotives went to Russia in 1991, 
but these locomotives have not been paid for yet.  Reacting to 
statements made by Minister of Industry and Trade Vladimir Dlouhy 
after his return from Vietnam about the possibility of selling 40 
Czech locomotives there, Rousek said that CKD was interested in the 
Vietnamese market but that it "does not know about this order."  The 
cooperation with the German AEG is making a slow start, Rousek 
noted, attributing this to AEG's great problems in its own markets. 
Because of these problems, the German manufacturer cannot afford to 
cede some of its orders to CKD as originally planned.  (Prague DENNI 
TELEGRAF in Czech 10 Nov 93 p 6)  Vietnam intends to purchase 40 CKD 
locomotives for approximately $40 million.  This was stated by Josef 
Husek, director of the Inekon company, which will finance the 
contract.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES PENIZE Supplement in Czech 11 
Nov 93 p 10 AU) 

   COMMERCIAL BANK EXPANDS INTERNATIONAL OPERATIONS:  Komercni Banka 
(Commercial Bank, KB) has opened a representative office in 
Bratislava as its second representative office abroad.  The KB's 
first representation abroad operates in Moscow.  The opening of a 
third foreign representation, in London, is planned for the near 
future.  The task of the Bratislava office is to provide consultancy 
services, including the mediation of contacts between Czech and 
Slovak businesses and the provision of services in the sphere of 
foreign payments.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY FINANCNI NOVINY Supplement 
10 Nov 93 p 2)  The general meeting of KB shareholders, held on 8 
November, approved an increase in the KB's capital stock through the 
issuance of over 2.5 billion Czech korunas' (Kc) worth of new 
shares.  The KB's capital stock will thus be raised from 
Kc5,001,642,0O0 to Kc7,502,463,000.  The KB's shareholders are the 
National Property Fund (44 percent), privatization investment funds 
(41.7 percent), individual shareholders (6.7 percent), and the 
restitution and subsidy investment funds (7.6 percent).  (Prague 
CESKY DENIK in Czech 10 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   'SKYROCKETING' SHARE PRICES:  The average share prices on the 
Prague Stock Exchange have been "skyrocketing" since approximately 
mid-August.  The "DNES Index," compiled by the Prague daily MLADA 
FRONTA DNES, for example, has increased 59 percent since its low in 
mid-August, while the "ZB Index," compiled by Zivnostenska Banka, 
has increased 75 percent.  The price of one CEZ (Czech Power- 
Generating Works) share, the share with the highest turnover on the 
Prague Stock Exchange, increased from Kc645 in mid-August to Kc1,655 
in the first week of November, that is, 156 percent.  Shares of 
Vodni Stavby Praha (Prague Hydraulic Engineering Works) have 
undergone the most spectacular appreciation -- from Kc256 to Kc910. 
Speculating on the reasons for the recent growth of share prices, a 
MLADA FRONTA DNES commentator suggested that the end-of-the-year 
rally may have nothing to do with the companies' true condition.  He 
pointed out that 72 percent of coupon privatization shares are owned 
by investment funds, which may charge up to 2 percent of the average 
value of their property as a fee for the fund's administration. 
They are therefore interested in driving the prices of their shares 
as high as possible.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 10 Nov 93 p 
6 AU) 

   HARVEST ESTIMATE:  According to the latest harvest estimate 
prepared by the Czech Statistical Office, based on data available by 
15 October, 6,449,831 tons of cereals are expected to be harvested 
in the Czech Republic this year, that is, an average of 4.02 tons 
from each of the 1,603,451 hectares that had been sown with cereals. 
The wheat harvest is expected to reach 3,323,873 tons (4.24 tons per 
hectare), the barley harvest 2,428,485 tons (3.80 tons per hectare), 
the rye harvest 251,571 tons (3.76 tons per hectare), the oats 
harvest 243,899 tons (3.59 tons per hectare), the triticale harvest 
63,642 tons (3.71 tons per hectare), and the harvest of corn grown 
for grain 138,361 tons (4.63 tons per hectare).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Czech 11 Nov 93 p 9 AU) 

   BANK LENDING:  Despite the lowering of the discount rate and of 
the lombard rate by 1.5 percent in June, commercial banks have been 
pursuing a ''very circumspect" lending policy in the third quarter 
of the year, in view of the rate of inflation and the high level of 
company insolvency.  In July, the volume of credits increased by Kc9 
billion, in August by Kc10 billion, and in September, according to 
preliminary calculations, by only Kc3 billion.  Commercial banks' 
credits in the domestic currency reached a total of Kc65O billion at 
the end of September 1993, which was Kc79 billion (13.8 percent) 
more than at the end of 1992.  The growing proportion of short-term 
credits, which represent 42.5 percent of the credit volume, 
demonstrates the banks' declining confidence in the reliable 
development of businesses.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 11 
Nov 93 p 11 AU) 

   FARM-MACHINERY MAKER TO PRODUCE TRUCKS:  Off-road trucks with a 
carrying capacity of up to six tons will become the main production 
program of the Agrozet Roudnice state enterprise, instead of 
agricultural machinery, according to Zdenek Vrana, the company's 
technical director.  Agrozet Roudnice has thus become the fourth 
truck manufacturer in the country, after Tatra, Liaz, and Avia.  The 
trucks from Roudnice bear the "Viza" trademark and are equipped with 
Italian VM Motori Spa Cento engines.  Agrozet sold the first 120 of 
these trucks this year and is preparing new models for next year. 
The Roudnice trucks cost about half as much as comparable foreign 
vehicles.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES PENIZE Supplement in Czech 11 
Nov 93 p 10 AU) 

   NEW CAR-WHEEL MANUFACTURER:  Agrostroj Jicin and Ronal, a 
Luxembourg-based holding company, have established a joint venture 
for the production of aluminum car wheels.  Production is scheduled 
to start in the second quarter of 1994.  The target capacity of the 
joint venture, in which the Luxembourg firm holds the majority 
stake, is 2,000 wheels per day.  This volume is to be reached with 
approximately 400 employees.  Skoda Mlada Boleslav is expected to be 
the joint venture's main customer, but exports are also planned. 
Agrostroj will have to compete with the Autokola company, a joint 
venture recently formed by Nova Hut Ostrava and the U.S. Hayes 
Wheels International company, which is engaged in the same line of 
business.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES PENIZE Supplement 11 Nov 93 p 
10 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN COMPANY BUYS INTO FOUNDRY:  The National Property Fund 
(FNM) and the Austrian Penn company have signed a contract on the 
sale of 32 percent of Moravske Kovarny (Moravian Foundry) Jihlava 
Co. shares to the Austrian company.  In the privatization project, 
the Austrian partner, which previously cooperated with the Jihlava 
foundry in marketing its products abroad, pledged to invest 8 
million Austrian schillings in the company.  About 60 percent of 
Moravske Kovarny shares were acquired by investment funds and 
individual investors in the first wave of coupon privatization, and 
about 5 percent of shares remain in the FNM's possession.  Moravske 
Kovarny is a supplier for the automobile and aircraft industries. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 11 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   SKODA PRODUCTION, EXPORT FIGURES:  According to Jiri Hrabovsky, 
spokesman for the Skoda Mlada Boleslav Co., the company produced 
177,500 and sold 176,700 automobiles in the first 10 months of the 
year, of which 63,000 were sold in the Czech Republic and 14,000 in 
the Slovak Republic.  The most important export markers this year 
have been Turkey (17,500 vehicles, 10,000 more than in the same 
period in 1992), Germany (17,000, a drop of 3,600 cars), Great 
Britain (10,500), Slovenia (7,300), PRC (5,200), France (5,000), 
Greece (4,000), and Korea (3,400).  The most disappointing results 
were on the Polish market, Hrabovsky said, where Skoda sold only 
2,200 vehicles in the first 10 months of the year, compared with 
17,700 a year ago.  Hrabovsky attributed this result to the 41- 
percent rise in the Skoda price caused by Polish "protectionist 
measures."  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 11 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   BRITISH KNOW-HOW FUND ENDS ACTIVITY:  The privatization process 
as a fundamental transformation of the Czech Economy is coming to a 
close, and from now on will continue as normal business, that is, in 
the privatization of individual projects, said Czech Premier Vaclav 
Klaus at a British Embassy commemoration of the end of the Know How 
Fund's activity in the Czech Republic.  British Minister of State at 
the Foreign Office Douglas Hogg also attended the event, and said 
that the Czech Government had achieved huge success in voucher 
privatization.  He added that while it was irrelevant to standard 
privatization methods in the West, it was custom-made for other 
post-communist countries, particularly the CIS. 

   Klaus praised the activity of the government Know-How Fund, whose 
experts functioned as counselors in the Czech Republic for three 
years.  He emphasized that it had been necessary for these people to 
live here for a long period in order for them to identify the 
character and problems of the country, and thus be capable of 
advising effectively.  The British Government has been working with 
the federal and Czech governments on voucher privatization since 
1990.  After the conclusion of the first wave of privatization, the 
British Government sponsored an additional consortium whose task was 
to prepare a study on the development of a secondary market for 
voucher shares.  Next, the fund concentrated on aiding the 
implementation of the RM-S off-board exchange system.  (Prague CTK 
in English 11 Nov 93 AU) 

   CZECH, PORTUGUESE BANKS SIGN TRADE SUPPORT AGREEMENT:  An inter- 
bank agreement signed in Prague on 11 November will support the 
development of bilateral trade between the Czech Republic and 
Portugal, Czech Industry and Trade Minister Vladimir Dlouhy and 
Portuguese Trade and Tourism Minister Ferdinand Faria de Oliviera 
announced.  The agreement, which was signed by five Czech banks and 
the main Portuguese financial institution, Caixa Geraed de Pozitos, 
provides mutual guarantees for the purchase of imports from the 
other country.  The Czech banks are:  Komercni Banka, Ceska 
Sporitelna, Ceskoslovenska Obchodni Banka, Investicni Banka, and 
Agrobanka.  (Prague CTK in English 11 Nov 93 AU) 

   COST OF HEAT, RENTAL HOUSING TO RISE 1 JANUARY:  The regulated 
price of heat supplied by heating plants will go up 16 percent and 
rents in rental houses will go up 40 percent as of 1 January 1994, 
Finance Minister Ivan Kocarnik announced after a meeting of 
government ministers on 11 November.  The impact of the increase in 
rents will be covered by housing allowances, which can be claimed by 
households where income per household member does not exceed 1.3 
times the minimum sustenance level.  The impact of the increase in 
the price of heat will be compensated by an increase in the minimum 
sustenance level.  No other increases of regulated prices are 
planned for 1 January, Kocarnik said.  The ministers' meeting also 
recommended the allocation of Kc300 million for salary increases in 
the budget-funded sphere as of 1 December.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Czech 12 Nov 93 p 1; Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 12 Nov 93 
pp 1, 2 AU) 

   POLL SHOWS GROWING DISSATISFACTION WITH FOOD PRICES:  Forty 
percent of citizens have, to a smaller or greater degree, problems 
with food and catering expenses, as was revealed by a poll conducted 
by the Institute for Research of Public Opinion (IVVM) among 777 
people over 15 in October.  In comparison with the July data, this 
is a 15-percent increase.  Sixty percent of the polled consider meat 
to be excessively expensive.  The figures for food (as received) and 
vegetables, and milk and dairy products were 22 percent and 12 
percent, respectively.  In September, meat prices increased by 10 to 
25 percent, according to type.  (Prague CTK in English 13 Nov 93 AU) 

   FINANCE MINISTER PREDICTS KORUNA CONVERTIBILITY BY 2000:  Finance 
Minister Ivan Kocarnik believes that "full external convertibility" 
of the Czech koruna will be achieved "by the year 2000 at the 
latest."  In his opinion, "65 percent of the path toward full 
external convertibility" has already been traversed.  Kocarnik also 
believes that the limit on the amount of foreign exchange Czech 
citizens may purchase in banks, which is to be raised to Kc15,0O0 in 
1994, will be completely abolished in 1995.  Kocarnik estimates the 
amount of money that used to be redistributed from the Czech 
Republic to Slovakia in the years of the federation at 23 to 27 
billion korunas annually and admits that the termination of these 
transfers is a "certain advantage for the Czech Republic in the 
sphere of finance." (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 13 Nov 93 p 1 
AU) 

   INCREASE IN FOREIGN WORKERS:  A total of 28,321 foreign workers, 
excluding Slovak workers, were registered with the Ministry of Labor 
and Social Affairs on 30 September 1993, compared with 16,096 at the 
end of March.  The greatest increase was in the number of Ukrainian 
workers (from 3,219 to 8,818) and Polish workers (from 5,753 to 
9,941).  The number of Vietnamese workers, on the other hand, 
declined from 1,066 to 640.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY KARIERA 
Supplement in Czech 15 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   GERMAN COMPANY TO BUILD PLASTICS PLANT:  Rehau, the German 
plastics manufacturer, decided to build a production plant in Ceska 
Lipa at a cost of Kc40 million.  The plant, which is to be built in 
the years 1994-95, will produce plastic parts for automobiles and 
home appliances.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 15 Nov 93 p 6 
AU) 

   GERMAN COMPANY BEGINS MANUFACTURING OPERATIONS:  The German 
Zoeller company, the world's leading manufacturer of feeding 
equipment, decided to produce in the Czech Republic containers for 
household and industrial waste with a capacity of between 60 liters 
and five cubic meters.  The Zoeller Systems Czech Republic Ltd. went 
into operation in Ricany near Prague on 1 October.  It employs 24 
people.  The Ricany plant also produces parts for the parent company 
in Laubenheim near Mainz.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 15 
Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   MONETARY SPLIT PROCESS TO BE SETTLED IN MAY 1994:  The last two 
federal coins still in use both in the Czech Republic and Slovakia, 
the five-crown and two-crown pieces, are to go out of circulation on 
November 30, according to a 15 November statement by Czech National 
Bank Spokesman Martin Svehla.  This measure is the last of concern 
to ordinary citizens in a number of steps making up the monetary 
split.  The monetary division will continue, as the banknotes and 
coins that are no longer valid have to be siphoned off from 
individuals and firms and destroyed and accounts with the Slovak 
National Bank settled, Svehla said.  The two-to-one currency 
division ratio agreed at the beginning of this year was taken to be 
tentative, as the two sides could not arrive at a binding ratio. 
The Czech National Bank has so far accumulated an equivalent of 
about 2.5 billion crowns ($85 million) more from old currency 
emissions than was to be its share after the breakup of the 
Czechoslovak State Bank.  Under a proviso based on the estimate that 
the two state banks would in the end accumulate only 99 billion 
crowns ($3,366 million), 1 billion crowns ($34 million) less than 
originally emitted, the two banks' commission was put at 1 million 
crowns to be shared according to the two-to-one ratio.  The end of 
May 1994 has been set as the deadline for balancing out the monetary 
split, Svehla said.  (Prague CTK in English 15 Nov 93 AU) 

   PRAGUE TO HOST EUROPEAN ECONOMISTS' CONFERENCE:  A conference of 
the European Economic Association will take place in Prague in 1995, 
Czech Economics Minister Karel Dyba said at a news conference on 15 
November.  It will be the first annual meeting of the association to 
take place outside Western Europe.  It is an honor that indicates 
how Prague is viewed in advanced circles of economic science and 
research, Dyba stressed.  The conference will bring to Prague top 
European and world economists.  Transformation processes, our 
experience and potential theoretical generalization of this 
experience will definitely be one of the main topics, he stressed. 
The association's members are prominent economists from 
universities, scientific institutes, international and government 
institutions, and financial circles.  (Prague CTK in English 15 Nov 
93 AU) 

   AGREEMENT ON WORLD BANK TELECOM LOAN SIGNED:  Jiri Makovec, 
general director of the Czech state-run Telecom company, and 
Wilfried Thalwitz, vice-president of the World Bank for Europe and 
Central Asia, signed an agreement on a World Bank loan of $80 
million for the modernization of Czech telecommunications in 
Washington on 1 November.  Simultaneously, the Czech ambassador to 
the United States, Michael Zantovsky, on behalf of the Czech 
Government, signed an agreement to guarantee the loan.  The planned 
modernization, which was approved by the World Bank on September 9, 
is to support further digitalization and extension of the Czech 
Republic's telecommunications network.  It also puts the 
telecommunications operation on a fully commercial basis.  The World 
Bank is one of the contributors to the project, which is to cost 
$891 million.  The European Investment Bank and the European Bank 
for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) are also participating. 
The World Bank loan is to be paid off within 15 years, with a five- 
year deferment.  (Prague CTK in English 1 Nov 93 AU) 

   DROP IN MILK, BEEF CONSUMPTION:  According to data of the 
Research Institute for the Economy of Agriculture, residents of the 
Czech Republic consumed an average of 81 kg of meat per capita last 
year, of which 44 kg was pork, 20.5 kg beef, and 11.4 kg poultry. 
Consumption of beef alone has dropped by one-third since 1989.  The 
annual consumption of milk also declined by one-third since 1989, to 
214 liters per head.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 2 Nov 93 p 2 
AU) 

   NEW BANK GOES INTO OPERATION:  Plzenska Banka a.s. (Plzen Bank) 
went into operation in Plzen on 1 November 1993.  The bank, which 
intends to provide all the standard banking services, has a capital 
stock of 300 million Czech korunas (Kc).  According to Petr Rybar, 
the general director of the bank, Plzenska Banka follows the 
traditions of a bank of the same name that operated in Plzen prior 
to World War II.  Eventually, it wants to set up branches in all the 
major cities of the republic.  (Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 2 Nov 93 
p 14 AU) 

   FORMER MINISTER WARNS OF CRITICAL SITUATION IN INDUSTRY: 
Starting the process of bankruptcies would cause an irreversible 
chain reaction in Czech industry, the consequence of which would be 
the collapse of qualified workers' teams, former Czech Minister of 
Engineering and Electrotechnology Miroslav Gregr said on 2 November. 
Speaking at a Czech Social Democratic Party (CSSD) news conference, 
Gregr, who is currently director-general of the joint stock company 
Desta, said that, owing to restrictive government policies, the 
situation in Czech industry had become critical.  He said that 
companies were currently plagued by short-term bank credits as banks 
were unwilling to prolong the terms of their repayment.  Gregr said 
that urgent measures should be adopted to force banks to provide 
industrial enterprises with credits at a reasonable rate of interest 
and terms of repayment especially in dynamically developed fields 
and those with prospects.  He said the role of industry is 
irreplaceable for the Czech economy and it cannot be taken over 
either by tourism, which has been declining recently, or by 
financial services.  (Prague CTK in English 2 Nov 93 AU) 

   RENAULT, KAROSA SET UP JOINT VENTURE:  The French utility vehicle 
manufacturer Renault Vehicules Industriels and the Czech bus 
manufacturer Karosa signed an agreement to set up a joint venture in 
Prague on 2 November.  Renault will initially hold 34 percent of the 
new venture's stock and hopes to acquire 51 percent in the near 
future.  The chief goals of the new company, for which Karosa 
designated its main factory in Vysoke Myto, east Bohemia, are to 
modernize Karosa's current production, quickly integrate Renault 
engines, and jointly design new models to complete the current 
Renault series.  All designs are to be financed from an investment 
plan representing about 200 million French francs over the next five 
years.  Owing to the economic recession on its traditional markets, 
Karosa last year had a turnover of Kc2 billion (about $70 million). 
While its annual production capacity used to be 3,500 vehicles, last 
year it produced only 1,300 buses.  Renault's investment is about 22 
percent higher than would correspond to the nominal value of 
Karosa's shares.  Karosa's book value is Kc522 million, but Renault 
accepted an appraisal that put Karosa's value at Kc640 million. 
(Prague CTK in English 2 Nov 93; Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 
3 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   According to "well-informed banking circles in the City of 
London," the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) 
is interested in a financial participation in the Karosa-Renault 
joint venture, possibly by means of share purchase.  The value of 
the EBRD's "share package" should not exceed the EBRD's credit to 
the Czech SPT Telecom company, that is, 71 million European Currency 
Unit (ECU).  The EBRD has invested some 165 million ECU in the Czech 
Republic to date.  (Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 30 Oct 93 p 14 AU) 
RAILROADS SHORT OF FREIGHT CARS:  According to Emanuel Sip, 
general director of Czech Railroads (CD), the CD is short of 
"thousands of freight cars" and can meet only about 80 percent of 
its customers' needs.  In October, for example, coal mines in the 
Sokolov area were short of 5,100 freight cars, in the Most area 
7,178 cars, and in the Ostrava area 3,600 cars.  The shortages are 
caused by the CD's lack of funds for repairs and the resulting 
increase in the number of cars that have to be taken out of 
operation.  Sip admits, however, that "insufficient market analysis" 
and the underestimation of the growth in demand also contributed to 
the shortages.  To alleviate the shortages, the CD is negotiating 
with railroads in Slovakia, Germany, Austria, Italy, and Slovenia on 
lease contracts for freight cars.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 3 Nov 93 p 3 AU) 

   SHELL ENTERS CZECH MARKET:  The Prague City Council approved the 
lease of two city-owned plots of land to the Shell Czechoslovakia 
company at the end of October.  The lease contracts are to run for 
35 years, and the rent will be subject to indexation.  The two gas 
stations that Shell Czechoslovakia will build on the leased plots 
(which are located in Pragure's Fourth and Tenth Districts) will be 
the first project undertaken by the Royal Dutch/Shell concern in the 
Czech Republic.  The British/Dutch concern intends to build 100 gas 
stations on the territory of the Czech Republic, 20 of them in 
Prague, and gain a market share of about 20 percent.  (Prague CESKY 
DENIK in Czech 3 Nov 93 p 12 AU) 

   2,300 AUSTRIAN FIRMS ACTIVE IN REPUBLIC:  Approximately 2,300 
Austrian firms currently have representation in the Czech Republic 
or are involved in business activities here, the Austrian ambassador 
to the Czech Republic, Peter Niesner, said at a press conference 
during a working visit to Ostrava on 3 November.  He added that 
during the first eight months of the year Austria exported goods 
worth 7.2 billion ATS (Austrian schillings) to the Czech Republic. 
Its imports from here were ATS 5.9 billion.  Niesner said Austria 
was interested in further expanding economic relations with the 
Czech Republic.  North Moravia and Silesia could have equally close 
contacts as the border regions of southern Moravia and Bohemia, he 
said, adding that particularly small-and medium-sized businesses 
should make use of the many opportunities.  (Prague CTK in English 3 
Nov 93 AU) 

   COOPERATION WITH BADEN-WUERTTEMBERG:  A joint declaration on 
continued cooperation between the Czech and Baden-Wuerttemberg 
economic ministries in building a Prague-based Center for Support of 
Small and Medium-Sized Companies (SPP) was signed in Prague on 3 
November.  The economic part of the agreement on the two countries' 
cooperation, signed in September 1991, includes support for the SPP. 
Baden-Wuerttemberg invests some 400,000 German marks (DM) a year in 
the two countries' cooperation, Baden-Wuerttemberg Deputy Premier 
and Economic Minister Dieter Spoeri told journalists.  Spoeri said 
that expert aid was sometimes more valuable than investment. 
Pointing out cooperation and integration in North America and 
Southeast Asia, he called similar processes in Europe indispensable 
mainly from the point of competitive ability.  (Prague CTK in 
English 3 Nov 93 AU) 

   TAX STAMP FOR CIGARETTE PACKAGES:  The Czech Government is 
attempting to combat the illegal import of cigarettes into the 
country by requiring all packs of cigarettes to bear an adhesive tax 
stamp as of January 1, 1994.  Deputy Finance Minister Jan Klak said 
the government's tax policy for tobacco products is contained in a 
bill that it is presenting to parliament in mid-November.  The 
government hopes the bill will be passed quickly, he said.  Czech 
and Slovak manufacturers of hard-pack cigarettes for sale in the 
Czech Republic, however, will temporarily have to imprint the boxes 
with the words Intended for Sale in the Czech Republic instead of 
af fixing a sticker.  Ondrej Denkstein, head of the Finance 
Ministry's Consumer Tax department, said the ministry had decided to 
exempt Czech and Slovak producers because the local tobacco industry 
presently did not have the technical means to put stickers on 
cigarette boxes.  The exemption will be revoked, however, in the 
second half of next year. 

   All cigarettes will have to be stamped as of January 1, 1994, and 
an inventory of all stocks must be completed by the end of this 
year.  The legal sale of non-stamped cigarettes will end on February 
28, 1994, and infractions are subject to a fine of up to Kc100 
million (about $3.4 million).  The price of the cigarette stamps 
will not exceed four hellers, and forging them will be punished with 
a maximum sentence of five years.  The stamps will be issued to 
producers and importers within 30 days of being ordered.  They are 
non-transferable, and the owner must guarantee against their damage 
or loss.  Importers can order another batch of stickers after those 
from previous orders have been returned to the Czech Republic.  The 
fine for each missing stamp will be Kc12.50 for producers and Kc30 
for importers.  The 22-by-45-millimeter stickers must be applied to 
the back of cigarette packs, beneath the cellophane, so that it 
folds over the corner.  An office of the Prague Regional Customs 
Office opened in Kutna Hora on 1 November to distribute and register 
stickers for domestic producers and importers.  The Phillip Morris 
Company, which controls the Czech tobacco monopoly Tabak and thus 
nearly 90 percent of the domestic cigarette market, estimates that 
cigarette smuggling may have deprived the state of Kc1-2 billion in 
tax revenues this year.  A total of Kc8 billion is expected to be 
collected.  (Prague CTK in English 3 Nov 93 AU) 

   AERO HOLDING COMPANY PRIVATIZATION:  The general meeting of 
shareholders of the AERO holding company, which associates the 
country's 10 manufacturers of aircraft and aircraft components 
(including Aero Vodochody, Let Kunovice, Moravan Otrokovice, Letov 
Praha, and Motorlet Praha), approved an updated privatization 
project for the holding, Zdenek Burian from AERO's public relations 
department told journalists.  The original privatization project 
provided for the privatization of 49 percent of shares in the first 
wave of coupon privatization, while 48 percent of shares were to 
remain temporarily in the possession of the National Property Fund 
(FNM) and 3 percent were to be earmarked for the restitution fund. 
Because only about 35 percent of AERO's shares were actually sold in 
the first privatization wave (28.7 percent were acquired by 
individual investors and 6.5 percent by investment funds), the 
shareholders' meeting had to modify the privatization project. 
Under the "updated project," Investicni Banka (Investment Bank, IB), 
AERO's main creditor, will become owner of 30 percent of the 
holding's shares, in the form of a debt for equity swap, while the 
FNM's stake will be reduced to 30.2 percent.  This stake will become 
permanent, however, to secure state control over the aircraft 
industry.  The remaining 4.6 percent of shares will be allocated to 
the restitution and differentiation funds.  The general meeting of 
AERO shareholders also elected a new Board of Directors.  Its new 
chairman is Jiri Samek from the lB.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
BURZOVNI NOVINY in Czech 4 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   MINISTER ON THIRD PRIVATIZATION WAVE:  Privatization projects for 
companies that will go private in the third privatization wave have 
to be passed to the ministries that founded them by January 1, 1994 
at the latest, Czech Minister for Privatization Jiri Skalicky said 
on 4 November.  At a press conference, Skalicky said that the 
projects would be passed on to the Privatization Ministry by March 
1, 1994.  The coupon method will not be used in the third wave, 
Skalicky said.  He added that several principles for working out the 
projects have changed, particularly as regards appraisal of 
property.  The principles are available at the Ministry for 
Privatization.  The coupon method was used in the first wave of 
privatization, which ended in December 1992, and it is also being 
used in the second wave.  Coupons for the second wave started being 
sold in October.  (Prague CTK in English 4 Nov 93 AU) 

   MINISTER URGES GERMANY TO IMPROVE RIVER TRANSPORT:  Czech 
Minister of Transport Jan Strasky has asked Germany to improve 
navigation on the Labe (Elbe) River on its territory so that the 
Czech Republic may make more effective use of the port of Hamburg, 
leased since 1929 for 100 years.  Addressing an international 
conference on transport routes between Western and Eastern Europe in 
Hamburg on 4 November, Strasky said that increasing freight 
transport along the Labe-Vltava route, which is the Czech Republic's 
natural access route to German ports, depended on improved 
navigation conditions mainly in the section from Usti nad Labem to 
Magdeburg in Germany.  Strasky said the Czech side had prepared a 
project for two weirs on the Czech side but this project can be 
useful only if conditions on the Labe are improved on the German 
side as well.  Strasky told CTK that he has been trying to find out 
whether Germany was willing to invest in its section of the river. 

   The Czech project is being strongly opposed by German 
environmentalists.  Also, river transport priorities in Germany have 
been clearly concentrating on linking the Berlin district with the 
industrial Ruhr region in Germany's western part.  Strasky 
emphasized the importance of modernizing railroad lines between the 
two countries.  Both sides expect the modernization to help increase 
the volume of railroad freight in order to relieve roads 
overburdened mainly in the border districts.  Air transport is 
developing successfully, Strasky said.  Prague has an air link with 
eight German cities.  The Czech Republic would welcome it if German 
airlines companies were interested in links with Brno, south 
Moravia, Ostrava, north Moravia, or Karlovy Vary, west Bohemia, he 
added.  (Prague CTK in English 4 Nov 93 AU) 

   POTENTIAL FOR ENERGY CONSERVATION:  The CEZ (Czech Power- 
Generating Works) a.s. estimates that 270 megawatts of power- 
generating capacity could be saved in the Czech Republic through 
conservation measures by the year 2000.  This would mean aggregate 
savings of up to 5,200 gigawatt hours of electricity for the 1994- 
2000 period.  According to the CEZ, the conservation measures would 
require the investment of Kc1.7 billion.  The company sees 
potentials for energy conservation mainly in industry, which 
consumed 52.5 percent of all energy in the Czech Republic in 1992, 
while households consumed 24.6 percent.  In advanced Western 
countries, households usually consume more energy than industry, the 
CEZ points out.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 5 Nov 93 p 2 
AU) 

   AUSTRIAN COMPANY BUYS INTO QUARRY:  The National Property Fund 
and the Austrian Steinindustrie Friepess company have concluded a 
contract, under which the Austrian company will purchase 45 percent 
of the 66,000 shares issued by the Prumysl Kamene Pribram (PKP) a.s. 
This was announced by PKP director Vlastimil Uhlir on 4 November. 
In the contract, Steinindustrie Friepess also pledged to invest 18 
million Austrian schillings in the company over the next three 
years, which will allow it to increase its share in PKP to 67 
percent by the end of 1995.  PKP, which has an annual turnover of 
Kc70 million, processes stoneware and granite for use in road 
building.  It controls 18 quarries, 11 of which are currently in 
use.  Together, Steinindustrie Friepess and PKP employ 500 people 
and control 21 quarries, which makes them the largest company in 
their field in Central Europe.  About 14,000 PKP shares will be 
offered to investors in the second wave of coupon privatization. 
(Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 5 Nov 93 p 14; Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in 
Czech 5 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT GETS SEAT ON SKODA BOARD:  An extraordinary meeting of 
shareholders of the Skoda automobile factory, held in Mlada Boleslav 
on 5 November, elected Radomir Sabela, deputy minister of trade and 
industry, deputy chairman of the Supervisory Board.  The state, 
which still holds a majority stake in Skoda, will thus be able 
directly to control the implementation of Volkswagen's investment 
plans in the company.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 6 Nov 93 p 
14 AU) 

   BICYCLE MANUFACTURERS DEMAND PROTECTION:  Favorit Rokycany and 
Eska Cheb, two manufacturers of bicycles, have asked for the 
protection of the domestic market against imports of cheap Asian 
bicycles.  Josef Jung, director of Eska Cheb, argues that Chinese 
bicycles can be imported for less than Kc2,000, which is less than 
Eska pays for materials alone.  He also points out that while the 
FRG levies a 50 percent duty on imports of Asian bicycles and 
Denmark a 70 percent duty, Czech importers pay only 10 percent when 
importing complete bicycles or 6 percent for components.  Eska Cheb 
is currently running at 50 percent capacity and Favorit Rokycany has 
even had to suspend production.  Tomas Husak, director of the 
foreign trade section at the Ministry of Industry and Trade, 
asserts, however, that the Czech Republic is bound by GATT rules and 
that it cannot adopt any "protective measures" unless Eska and 
Favorit submit to the ministry evidence that Asian bicycles are 
being imported at dumping prices.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in 
Czech 6 Nov 93 p 14 AU) 

   GERMANY'S QUELLE OPENS MAIL ORDER CENTER:  The German Quelle mail 
order company opened its own distribution center at Brezhrad in east 
Bohemia on 4 November, in the presence of Minister of Economy Karel 
Dyba.  It is the company's first mail order center in the countries 
of Central and Eastern Europe.  The center, built at a cost of DM11 
million, includes a warehouse with a floor space of 11,000 square 
meters.  It employs 330 people who dispatch an average of 12,000 
parcels per day.  Since the establishment of its Czech subsidiary in 
February 1992, Quelle has acquired over 400,000 Czech customers.  It 
expects a turnover of DM5O million in the Czech Republic this year. 
(Prague TELEGRAF in Czech 6 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   SKODA CLAIMS IN SLOVAKIA:  The claims of the Skoda Plzen concern 
in Slovakia have reached the sum of Kc1.1 billion, Jaroslav Hudec, 
press spokesman for the company, told journalists on 5 November. 
The bulk of this sum, Kc850 million, is owed by the state-owned SEP 
power-generating company for equipment manufactured for the Mochovce 
nuclear power station.  Skoda proposes that the debt be repaid by 
deliveries of electricity.  However, this depends on the completion 
of the Mochovce power station, the financing of which has not yet 
been secured.  According to Hudec, SEP also owes Kc500 million to 
the Czech Power-Generating Works, which, together with other SEP 
commitments, "strongly undermines its creditworthiness.'' (Prague 
TELEGRAF in Czech 6 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   NEW HEALTH CARE REGULATIONS TO GO INTO EFFECT IN 1994:  A new 
categorization of medicines and a regulation of their prices, which 
would place pressure on individual pharmacies and their suppliers to 
offer patients the least expensive drugs -- both foreign and 
domestic -- should go into effect next April, said Minister of 
Health Ludek Rubas on 6 November.  After addressing the Third 
Congress of the Czech Medical Chamber in Olomouc, Rubas told 
journalists that a state office to cover individual insurers and to 
define the regulations for them should also start work next year. 
This would mean that the differences between the level of services 
offered by insurance companies to their clients would be removed. 
Rubas said that the state would not prevent new insurance companies 
from going into business, but would set down specific conditions 
that, if not met, would allow the insurers to be shut down.  Rubas 
said that it was necessary speedily to resolve the creation of the 
line between ambulatory and bed arrangements, which would make 
patients' stays in the hospital no longer than necessary.  (Prague 
CTK in English 6 Nov 93 AU) 

   MERCEDES MAY BUILT ASSEMBLY PLANT:  The interest of the German 
car maker Mercedes in investment in the Czech Republic and its 
readiness to hold talks with the Industry and Trade Ministry must be 
assessed positively, Deputy Industry and Trade Minister Radomir 
Sabela told CTK after his talks with Mercedes representatives in 
Prague on 6 November.  Mercedes is looking at three cities -- Brno, 
south Moravia, Olomouc, north Moravia, and Plzen, west Bohemia -- 
for new investment.  The company intends to build an assembly line 
for the production of a new small-sized car model, Sabela said. 
Along with France and Great Britain, the Czech Republic is among the 
countries where Mercedes is considering locating the plant.  Sabela 
told the economic daily HOSPODARSKE NOVINY that the Czech Republic 
would not offer the German company any tax or customs exemptions but 
that "the advantages offered by the Czech Republic are worth more 
than specific money."  He said that Plzen, in particular, offered 
excellent conditions because it has a decent infrastructure, a new 
university, and because the city was ready to make available to 
Mercedes-Benz the site of the former Bory airfield.  The presence in 
the city of the Skoda concern, which could participate in the 
construction of the assembly plant, is also an advantage, Sabela 
said.  The final decision is to be made by mid-December.  (Prague 
CTK in English 6 Nov 93; Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 9 Nov 93 
pp 1, 2 AU) 

   PRAGUE HOSTS BIOTECHNOLOGY CONFERENCE:  The international 
conference "Biotechnology and Business" opened with a ceremonial 
session in Prague on 7 November in the presence of Czech Economic 
Minister Karel Dyba and David Baltimore, Nobel Prize laureate, from 
the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  The event, which lasts 
until November 9, is jointly organized by Charles University and New 
York University.  The conference is being attended by 
biotechnologist5 from 21 European and American countries, as well as 
representatives of she biotechnological industry, business, and 
financial circles.  It is a historical opportunity for the research 
and scientific communities of Central and Eastern European countries 
to meet with representatives of business and financial circles from 
free market countries, Joseph Rosenberg, chairman of the Institute 
for International Enterprise, told CTK.  (Prague CTK in English 7 
Nov 93 AU) 

   CRISIS IN TEXTILE INDUSTRY:  The production volume in the textile 
and clothing industry is declining faster than in other industries, 
and the recession is worse than in the EC countries' textile 
industries, according to Jiri Kohoutek, director of the Association 
of the Textile, Clothing, and Leather Working Industry.  In the last 
three years, the production of the textile and clothing industry 
declined by 45 percent.  In 1992, textile sales dropped to 56.7 
percent and clothing sales to 47.8 percent of the 1990 level. 
Textile firms' profits were almost 70 percent lower and clothing 
firms' profits 27 percent lower last year than in 1991.  At the same 
time, the Czech textile firms' high indebtedness makes it impossible 
to restructure them to make them internationally competitive. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 8 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   TOURISM BOOM SUBSIDING:  Almost 54 million tourists visited the 
Czech Republic in the first nine months of the year, 5.5 percent 
more than in the same period last year, according to information 
released by the Czech Statistical Office on 8 November.  Increases 
in the number of tourists grew more slowly from the beginning of the 
year to April.  The number of tourists was in January 45.6 percent 
higher than in the same month last year, while by February it was 
only 14.1 percent higher, and in March, April, and May it was 9.5, 
6.7, and 15.5 percent higher.  The number of tourists in June was 
0.7 percent lower, in July 3.4 percent, and in August 2.9 percent. 
The total number of foreign visitors in September was 6.8 million -- 
0.6 percent fewer than in the same month last year. 

   Only the number of tourists arriving by road increased in the 
first nine months of 1993 compared with the same period last year 
(by 5.9 percent), while the number of those coming by rail fell by 
0.3 percent, and the number of those arriving by air fell by 9.3 
percent.  The largest number of visitors crossed the border from 
Germany.  The figure was 31.7 million in the first nine months and 
the overall growth compared the same period last year was 5.8 
percent.  Around 9.8 million tourists came from Austria, a drop of 
0.7 percent.  The number of Polish visitors grew by 11.5 percent to 
11.5 million.  Around 22.4 million citizens of the Czech and Slovak 
Republics made trips abroad in the surveyed period, which was 6.4 
percent fewer than last year.  The number of foreign trips fell by 
3.9 percent in September.  The data do not include the border with 
the Slovak Republic.  (Prague CTK in English 8 Nov 93 AU) 

   Income from tourism reached almost $911 million, that is, 
approximately Kc27 billion, in the first eight months of the year, 
37.8 percent more than in the same period in 1992.  This was 
equivalent to 10.9 percent of the Czech Republic's export volume in 
this period.  Despite the increase in income from tourism, each of 
the 46.8 million foreigners who visited the Czech Republic in 
January-August 1993 spent only about Kc600, or $20, in the country. 
Only 1.1 million foreign visitors made use of accommodation 
facilities registered in the trade register.  In the same period, 
Czech Republic citizens spent $325 million on trips abroad.  Net 
income from tourism was thus $585 million.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES in Czech 8 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   NUMBER OF HOTEL BEDS:  A total of 1,344 accommodation facilities 
with 114,236 beds were registered in the trade register at the end 
of the first half of 1993, of which 202, with a total of 26,190 
beds, were in Prague.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Nov 93 p 
14 AU) 

   SURVEY OF POTENTIAL FOREIGN INVESTORS:  Czechinvest, the Czech 
agency for the promotion of foreign investment, has published the 
results of a survey aimed at ascertaining the interest of potential 
foreign investors in the republic.  A total of 281 foreign companies 
participated in the survey, 166 of which are already represented in 
Central and Eastern Europe.  Asked about the main considerations 
determining their interest in investing in Central and Eastern 
Europe, most respondents (28 percent) cited "economic stability" as 
the most important factor, followed by "the size of the domestic 
market" (18 percent), "low production costs" (16 percent), the 
availability of a skilled labor force (12 percent), "good 
communications" (6 percent), the availability of financial support 
(6 percent), and "return on investment'' (5 percent).   Asked about 
the "least important considerations" for investing in Central and 
Eastern Europe, most respondents cited good communications (38 
percent), return on investment (18 percent), and the size of the 
domestic market (15 percent).  Asked which East European country 
they considered most suitable for the development of their economic 
activities, most foreign companies (35.7 percent) mentioned the 
Czech Republic, followed by Hungary (26.3 percent), Poland (23.5 
percent), Slovakia (9.4 percent), Romania (2.9 percent), and 
Bulgaria (2.2 percent).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 9 Nov 
93 p 17 AU) 

   GOLD DEPOSITS:  Experts estimate that there are about 300 tons of 
recoverable gold in rock formations on the territory of the Czech 
Republic.  The best known localities are Vacikov near Pribram, 
Mokrsko in central Bohemia, and Kasperske Hory in west Bohemia. 
According to representatives of the Ministry of Economy, interest of 
foreign firms in Czech gold deposits is growing.  The ministry is 
therefore preparing a competitive tender for the exploration of 
deposits on Czech territory.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 9 
Nov 93 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   TRUCK MANUFACTURER COPING WITH RECESSION:  Avia Letnany, a 
manufacturer of light trucks, is successfully coping with the 
problems caused by the worldwide recession in the automobile 
industry, Pavel Chaloupka, assistant general director of the 
company, told journalists on 8 November.  In 1992, Avia sold 11,036 
vehicles, 9,726 of them on the domestic market, and made a profit of 
Kc71.9 million.  Of the 1,580 trucks exported, 32.28 percent went to 
France, 19.37 percent to Egypt, 18.92 percent to Poland, and 17.53 
percent to the republics of the former Soviet Union.  Avia also 
exported trucks to Paraguay and Germany (about 300 vehicles) for the 
first time last year.  Despite a 30 percent drop in sales to 
Slovakia since the beginning of this year, Avia also expects to make 
a profit in 1993.  (Prague TELEGRAF in Czech 9 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   TRADE DEFICIT WITH BRITAIN REACHES 25 MILLION POUNDS:  In the 
first ten months of this year, Czech producers exported goods worth 
173 million pounds to Britain, which exceeds the Czechoslovak 
exports to Britain for the whole of 1992, Britain's Department of 
Trade and Industry told CTK on 9 November.   Even so, the Czech 
Republic is currently running a 25-million-pound deficit in its 
trade with Britain.  Skoda cars dominate Czech exports with 28.5 
million pounds' worth sold, despite a one-and-a-half percent drop in 
sales this year.  (Prague CTK in English 9 Nov 93 AU) 

   CONTRACT WITH U.S. COMPANY CANCELED:  On 9 November, the 
Rectorate of the Prague Academy of Performing Arts (AMU) sent the 
owner of the U.S. firm HN Gorin notice that it was withdrawing from 
the contract concerning the 50-year lease of part of the Lazansky 
Palace, which houses the Cafe Slavia and the Parnas Restaurant, and 
is administered by the AMU.  AMU Rector Jaroslav Vostry said that 
the reason for the withdrawal was that HN Gorin had not paid the 
academy rent in the last period.  A further reason was that Gorin 
had sublet the exclusive Parnas Restaurant to Sanjiv Suri, a 
businessman and restaurateur, without the agreement of the AMU.  HN 
Gorin was bound by the agreement to restore the historic Prague 
cafe, a haunt of students and intellectuals since it opened in the 
1860's, but the contract did not stipulate a deadline.  Cafe Slavia 
has remained closed after HN Gorin signed the lease agreement in 
March 1992.  The Senate of the Academy of Performing Arts (AMU) 
decided that it would put the lease of the Cafe Slavia and the 
adjoining Parnas Restaurant out to tender once more.  The conditions 
of the tender will be announced to interested parties at the AMU in 
Prague on November 30.  (Prague CTK in English 9 Nov 93; Prague CTK 
in English 15 Nov 93; Prague CTK in English 18 Nov 93 AU) 

   EC FUNDS FOR NONGOVERNMENTAL ORGANIZATIONS:  The European 
Community (EC) Fund, administered in the Czech Republic by the 
Foundation for the Development of Civic Society under the PHARE 
program (Economic Reconstruction Aid for Poland and Hungary) 
allocated its first grants to Czech nongovernmental organizations, 
Foundation Director Alena Huptychova told CTK on 9 November.  In 
all, 37 grants totalling over Kc5 million ($170,000) have been made 
available, she said.  Twelve information sphere proJects, five 
training schemes for non-governmental organizations' employees, 20 
projects concerning the protection of nature and human rights, 
including those of minorities, and humanitarian aid will receive 
financial assistance from PHARE, Huptychova said.  New requests for 
subsidies will be periodically considered in the future, Huptychova 
added.  Under PHARE, the EC has given the Foundation for the 
Development of Civic Society 2.6 million ECU, which the foundation, 
established in May of this year, will use over a three-year period 
to provide help for flon-governmental organizations.  (Prague CTK in 
English 9 Nov 93 AU) 

   MINERS PROTEST MINE CLOSURE:  Ostrava miners' unions do not agree 
with the intention of Ostrava-Karvinska Mines to close down the Dola 
Odra mine, which employs 2,600 people, by December 31 this year. 
Unionists said at a press conference in Ostrava on 9 November that 
shutting the mine was also at odds with the plans of the Ministry of 
Industry and Trade.  They backed this up with a letter that Industry 
Minister Vladimir Dlouhy had written to the miners' unions on July 
12, 1993, in which he said that the period from July 1st to December 
31, 1993 was designated for the drawing up of a liquidation project 
and a program to help ease the social consequences, not for 
commencing the closure of the mine, which was to start as of January 
1, 1994 and was to be conditional on the approval of the ministry's 
programs by the miners' union.  More than 60 percent of the mine 
workers were counting on being able to work until the end of the 
year, the unionists said, adding that they had no resources 
guaranteed by the state with which to pay benefits to the redundant 
miners.  The unionists said they had prepared several steps towards 
resolving the situation, but declined to specify them, mentioning 
only a meeting called for 10 November between Dola Odra mine workers 
and the general director of Ostrava-Karvinska Mines, Ivan Dzida. 
(Prague CTK in English 9 Nov 93 AU) 

   IMPORTS OF BLOOD DERIVATIVES BANNED:  The Czech Ministry of 
Health banned imports and the use of blood derivatives from three 
foreign firms as of November 5 to prevent the spread of the HIV 
virus, Ministry spokeswoman Marketa Soukupova told CTK on 9 
November.  The ban includes products of the German firm UB Plasma, 
which have been found to be contaminated with HIV, except for the 
albumins, as the process used for their production cancels out any 
possibility of HIV contamination, Soukupova said.  Biotest Pharma, a 
German firm which cooperated with UB Plasma, and the Austrian firm 
Immuno Vienna had also been affected by the ban, she said, adding 
that the ministry is also studying the firms' documentation.  No 
restrictions have been put on the products of the firm Grifois, 
which maintains the practice, in its foreign-based installations, of 
separate processing of Czech blood.  Similarly, the firm Behriwerke 
is unaffected, as its products fully conform to safety guarantees, 
Soukupova said.  The Czech Republic has enough blood derivative- 
producing capacity to cover its needs, Soukupova said.  Reportedly, 
about 600 hemophiliacs currently depend on blood product treatment. 
(Prague CTK in English 9 Nov 93 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   WARNING AGAINST GOVERNMENT INTERFERENCE IN CAPITAL MARKET:  At a 
news conference in Bratislava on 18 November, representative5 of the 
Association of Investment Companies and Investment Funds warned 
against the adoption by the Slovak Parliament of the governments 
sponsored amendment to the Law on Investment Companies and 
Investment Funds.  Under the amendment, investment funds will be 
required to report to the Ministry of Finance 30 days in advance all 
transactions the value of which exceeds 10 percent of the value of 
their portfolio or 5 percent of the value of a single issuer's 
shares.  No such transaction will be allowed to proceed unless the 
Ministry of Finance gives its consent.  The funds' representatives 
warned that the amendment will discourage all foreign investors, as 
decisions on capital markets must be made within minutes and a 30- 
day deadline will "render all intended transactions meaningless." 
They admitted that the "duty to report" planned large-scale 
transactions is to be found in analogous laws in other countries, 
where, however, it is fellow investors who are entitled to know 
about shares changing hands and not a state agency.  Gustav 
Wurmboeck, an Austrian financier who attended the news conference, 
said that if the amendment is passed in its current form, he does 
not know "a single foreign investor who would be willing to invest 
even one dollar in Slovakia."  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 
19 Nov 93 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   NATIONAL PROPERTY FUND'S SHARE OWNERSHIP:  According to L. 
Melcicky, chairman of the National Property Fund (FNM) Executive 
Committee, the FNM currently owns shares with a nominal value of 49 
billion Slovak korunas (Sk).  In only 190 of the 557 privatized 
shareholding companies in Slovakia is the FNM's stake lower than 10 
percent.  In all other shareholding companies, the FNM is the key 
owner or administrator.  In 105 shareholding companies, the FNM 
holds between 51 and 66.6 percent of shares and in 69 companies more 
than two-thirds of all shares.  Melcicky said that the FNM would 
like to sell "entire packages" of some of its stock on the capital 
market or in public tenders.  To do this, it will have to ask the 
Ministry of Privatization or the government for changes in the 
privatization projects.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 19 Nov 
93 p 21 AU) 

   BRATISLAVA-KIEV FLIGHTS INAUGURATED:  Flights on the Kiev- 
Uzhhorod-Bratislava route were inaugurated on 19 November.  There 
will be two round-trip flights per week, on Tuesdays and Fridays, by 
a 45-seat AN-24.  The route is operated jointly by the Zilina-based 
Tradeways company and Air Kiev, a private Ukrainian company. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 20 Nov 93 p 2; Bratislava NARODNA 
OBRODA in Slovak 20 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   PROBLEMS OF VELKY KRTIS COAL MINE:  Coal mining in the "Dolina" 
mine in Velky Krtis, southern Slovakia, is to be phased out by the 
year 2005.  Within the last four years, production has declined from 
1 million tons to 600,000 tons annually and the number of employees 
has been cut from 2,000 to 1,500.  More than 80 percent of coal from 
the "Dolina" mine is supplied to the Novaky power station.  The 
marketing of coal from Velky Krtis is becoming increasingly 
difficult, however, because of the availability of cheaper and 
higher-quality Czech coal.  It costs Sk900 to extract one ton of 
coal in the "Dolina" mine, which is twice as much as the population 
pays for graded coal.  One-half of production costs is subsidized by 
the state.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 20 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   PAYMENTS AGREEMENT WITH CZECH REPUBLIC TO BE ALTERED:  Changes in 
the payments agreement between Slovakia and the Czech Republic may 
be expected next year, the Slovak Finance Ministry reported on 22 
November.  Settlement of payments, receivables, and liabilities 
arising between commercial entities would, under the expected 
change, be made through the "new bloc," with payments being 
calculated at the relevant ECU rate.  The Finance Ministry is 
recommending that business entities balance as many as possible of 
their claims and liabilities originating before February 8, 1993, 
when the Czechoslovak currency split into two.  The payments 
agreement signed February 4 outlines the payments relationship 
between physical and legal entities in the two republics, having the 
form of clearing in most cases.  (Prague CTK in English 22 Nov 93 
AU) 

   TEN-MONTH FOREIGN TRAVEL DATA:  In the first 10 months of the 
year, 2,646,000 Slovak citizens travelled to Hungary, 2,182,000 to 
Austria, and 1,355,000 to Poland -- the three most popular foreign 
destinations for Slovaks (apart from the Czech Republic, which is 
not included in the statistics).  Over the same period, 5,847,000 
Hungarians, 2,293,000 Austrians, 2,258,000 Poles, and 665,000 
Ukrainians visited Slovakia.  Since the beginning of the year, 
4,404,000 motor vehicles have been cleared at Slovak border 
crossings, 2,242,000 of which came from Hungary and 1,317,000 from 
Austria.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 23 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   MOTOROLA INTERESTED IN TESLA PIESTANY:  The Council of Creditors 
of the Tesla Piestany company, which, after the collapse of the 
eastern markets and the drastic decline of electronics production in 
the Czech Republic and Slovakia, is facing bankruptcy, has adopted a 
recovery program" for the company, at the heart of which is the 
decision to set up a joint venture with the transnational Motorola 
company.  Tesla's domestic creditors and the European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) would also become partners in 
the venture.  Motorola is ready to "immediately invest several 
million U.S. dollars" in Tesla Piestany and to guarantee the 
marketing of its entire output of semiconductor components. 

   According to Lubomir Cergel, a Slovak native, of Motorola's 
European Semiconductor Products Group, in the initial phase, 
Motorola intends to launch in Tesla Piestany the assembly of 1.4 
million units of transistors per week.  Eventually, the weekly 
output should reach 5 million transistors.  According to the project 
submitted by Cergel to the Council of Creditors, Motorola and the 
EBRD would like to invest $16.9 million in Tesla Piestany by the end 
of 1995 and to establish in Piestany Motorola's "world center for 
so-called small signals transistors."  Motorola makes the formation 
of the joint venture conditional on the write-off of Tesla's old 
debts, however.  Motorola argues that it cannot accept 
responsibility for past loans that were used to purchase obsolete 
equipment at prices that far exceeded world market prices. 
(Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 23 Nov 93 p 5 AU) 

   SHOPPING CENTER TO SERVE HUNGARIAN, AUSTRIAN CUSTOMERS:  In March 
1994, the Austrian firm Mayreder will start building the Shopping 
Center Bratislava (BCP) in the southern part of Bratislava- 
Petrzalka, in the immediate vicinity of the Austrian and Hungarian 
borders.  The 40,000-square meter shopping center, which will 
accommodate 80 shops, will be completed in the fall of 1996.  The 
investors reckon that the BCP, which will create jobs for about 
1,000 people, will attract customers from nearby Hungary and 
Austria.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 23 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   OPPOSITION PARTY TO SUBMIT NEW PRIVATIZATION BILL:  In days to 
come, the opposition Democratic Left Party (SDL) will submit to the 
parliament a new bill on big privatization, which it expects to be 
discussed in January.  As long as power is concentrated in hands of 
some people who decide on passing privatization projects, the 
struggle will rage over the control over the privatization ministry, 
and the politicians will eagerly pursue only their own interests to 
such an extent, which will lead to the collapse of any coalition, 
SDL Chairman Peter Weiss told a press conference on 23 November, 
referring to the newly concluded coalition between the Movement for 
a Democratic Slovakia (HZDS) and the Slovak National Party (SNS). 
The bill to be submitted by the SDL is not only aimed at preventing 
speculation.  By it, the SDL tried to create conditions for the 
privatization being no longer the subject of continual wild and 
arrogant political struggle, Weiss said.  The bill is to guarantee 
the parliament's control over privatization and the assessment of 
privatization projects by real experts.  Privatization must not be a 
source from which to fill the coffers of political parties, which 
would thus prepare themselves for future elections, Weiss stressed. 
(Prague CTK in English 23 Nov 93 AU) 

   EUROPEAN UNION FUNDS FOR SMALL BUSINESS:  The National Agency for 
the Development of Small and Medium-Sized Businesses will avail 
itself of almost 14 million European Currency Units next year -- 
that is, about Sk500 million.  The funds have been provided by 
countries of the European Union within the framework of the PHARE 
program.  This was announced by J. Brhel, general director of the 
agency, at a news conference in Bratislava on 23 November.  The 
m,,oney will be used to build a "business innovation center" and 
regional consultancy and information centers," as well as for loans 
and loan guarantees for small and medium-sized businesses. 
(Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 24 Nov 93 p 2)  Between 45 and 55 
percent of the 40 million ECUs that Slovakia will receive within the 
framework of the PHARE program in 1993 will be used to develop the 
private sector.  S?me 18 to 22 percent will be used for 
infrastructure projects, the same percentage for "the development of 
human resources," and 10 to 15 percent will be earmarked for "other 
areas," such as the General Technical Assistance Program (GTAF). 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 19 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   TIMBER PRODUCTION SCALED DOWN:  Production of raw timber has been 
reduced from 5.2-5.5 million cubic meters to approximately 4 million 
cubic meters annually, Karol Cajanek, department head at the Slovak 
Ministry of Agriculture, told a TASR correspondent.  Of this amount, 
2.5 million cubic meters come from the state sector and 1.5 million 
cubic meters from the private sector.  Some 1.5 million hectares of 
forests are in state ownership or "in the stage of reprivatization," 
Cajanek said, while 450,000 hectares have already been privatized. 
Cajanek estimates that, eventually, 35-40 percent of Slovak forests 
will remain in state ownership, including privately owned forests, 
the administration of which has been entrusted to the state. 
(Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 24 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   WARNING AGAINST CUTS IN AGRICULTURAL BUDGET:  Cyril Moravcik, 
chairman of the Union of Agricultural Cooperatives, told the daily 
PRAVDA that the Slovak Government's draft budget for 1994 provides 
for only Sk6.8 billion in agricultural subsidies, which represents a 
reduction by 39 percent against 1993.  Moravcik said that farmers 
felt "cheated and disappointed" by the budget because it ran counter 
to the intentions contained in the "Concept and Principles of 
Agrarian Policy," which foresaw a 3-4 percent reduction in 
agricultural subsidies, and to the government's own "Green Report," 
which reckoned with Sk9.4 billion in agricultural subsidies in 1994. 
According to Moravcik, the government was "playing with fire" as 
farmers could no longer be expected to play the role of a "social 
shock absorber" by selling their produce for less than the 
production costs.  Moravcik pointed out that in 1992, when subsidies 
where much higher, 95 out of 100 agricultural cooperatives and state 
farms operated at a loss.  He also noted that, even now, farmers' 
monthly earnings are Sk900 below the national average.  (Bratislava 
PRAVDA in Slovak 24 Nov 93 pp 1, 5 AU) 

   AUSTRIAN SUPERMARKET CHAIN OPENS FIRST SHOP:  The first 
supermarket of the Austrian Billa chain in Slovakia was opened in 
Trnava on 24 November, in the presence of Karl Vlaschek, the owner 
of Billa.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 25 Nov 93 p 3 AU) 

   RECORD TRANSACTION ON SECURITIES EXCHANGE:  On 24 November, for 
the first time since trading at the Bratislava Securities Exchange 
(BCPB) began in April, the volume of trade in a single issuer's 
shares exceeded the sum of Sk1 million.  The record transaction 
involved 1,400 shares of the Biotika Slovenska Lupca a.s., a 
pharmaceutical company.  Since the beginning of November, volume of 
trading at the BCPB has exceeded the sum of Sk30 million. 
(Bratislava SME in Slovak 25 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   FINAL HARVEST RESULTS:  Slovak farmers harvested 2,472,000 tons 
of cereals and 684,000 tons of corn this year.  While there will be 
enough alimentary grain to last until the next harvest, some 357,000 
tons of feed grain will have to be imported.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 25 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   INCREASE IN SAVINGS REPORTED:  Slovak citizens' bank deposits 
increased by Sk1.676 billion in the first nine months of 1993 -- 
from Sk99.382 billion at the end of 1992 to Sk101.058 billion at the 
end of September 1993.  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 26 Nov 93 p 2 
AU) 

   CITY TO BECOME SHAREHOLDER IN BANKA SLOVAKIA:  Deputies to the 
Banska Bystrica City Council decided on 25 November that the city 
would become a shareholder in the Slovakia shareholding company, 
which was set up in September 1993 with the aim of establishing the 
Banka Slovakia.  The city's share in the bank, the capital stock of 
which is Sk1 billion, will consist of a building, valued at Sk86 
million, that will house Banka Slovakia's head office.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 26 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   ECONOMIC RELATIONS WITH HUNGARY:  Approximately 100 businessmen 
from east Slovakia and Hungary took part in a meeting in Kosice on 
26 November which aimed to update them on legal conditions for 
bilateral economic cooperation.  Officials from the Hungarian 
Ministry for International Business Contacts and Slovak Economics 
Ministry were also present.  Similar actions in the past have 
brought about a marked increase in bilateral cooperation, said 
Ludovit Korotnoky, chairman of the Kosice Regional Office of the 
Chamber for Industry and Commerce.  Some 345 Slovak-Hungarian 
companies and 41 Hungarian companies have registered in Slovakia so 
far.  Hungarian investments in Slovakia have reached some $2.1 
million.  (Prague CTK in English 26 Nov 93 AU) 

   BANK OFFICIAL CRITICIZES STATE SUPPORT FOR BANKRUPT FIRMS: 
Slovak state authorities, which at the beginning of reforms 
refrained from interfering in the restructuring of the economy, are 
currently delaying the implementation of the law on bankruptcy, says 
the general director of the Strategic and Organizing Division of the 
Slovak Vseobecna Uverova Banka (General Credit Bank), Frantisek 
Szikhart.  In an interview carried by the Czech daily HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY on 26 November, Szikhart says that in a normal banking world 
in countries with a market economy such insolvent partners as we are 
cultivating here would long ago have been taken to bankruptcy 
proceedings.  They are able to vegetate due to the state's 
intervention, although many in Slovakia realize that such inactivity 
in the banking world will not contribute toward economic recovery, 
according to Szikhart.  He says that nearly every enterprise owes 
something to somebody, and estimates insolvency in Slovakia at 90 
billion Slovak crowns.  Foreign banks avoid granting direct credits 
for business plans, but they are willing to finance certain needs 
through credits, while requesting guarantees from banks, Szikhart 
explains, adding that bankruptcy proceedings are a solution, though 
for many enterprises only an emergency one.  (Prague CTK in English 
26 Nov 93 AU) 

   STATE FARMS' LOSSES REDUCED:  In the opinion of V. Biros, section 
chief at the Slovak Ministry of Agriculture, "stabilization and 
signs of a turn for the better are gradually making themselves felt 
in the economic development of state farms."  Biros says that, in 
spite of the extraordinary drought this summer, in the first three 
quarters of 1993 state farms in Slovakia reduced their losses by 
Sk439 million, compared with the same period a year ago.  Biros 
attributes the improvement in the state farms' economic condition to 
the increased use of their own intermediary products (seeds, 
livestock, feed) and to the sale of assets.  The improvement will 
not suffice to achieve a positive economic result, however.  Biros 
expects Slovak state farms to take in Sk8.129 billion this year, 
which will fall Sk1.191 billion short of their estimated 
expenditures of Sk9.320.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 26 
Nov 93 p 22 AU) 

   LOW TRADE TURNOVER WITH POLAND:  Stanislav Lautsch-Bendkowski, 
economic councillor at the Polish Embassy in Bratislava, told a 
correspondent of the Bratislava daily PRAVDA that Polish-Slovak 
trade reached a turnover of "only $215 million" in the first nine 
months of 1993.  Poland is Slovakia's seventh most important trading 
partner, after Hungary and Ukraine.  Lautsch-Bendkowski expects 
Polish-Slovak trade to increase "by a minimum of 10 percent" next 
year.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 26 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SLOVAK-AUSTRIAN AIR TRAFFIC AGREEMENT:  A Slovak-Austrian air 
traffic agreement, which will permit the opening of air links 
between the two countries, was initialed in Vienna on 26 November. 
The possibility of operating flights between Kosice and Vienna is 
being considered.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 27 Nov 93 p 
10 AU) 

   GROWING PROPORTION OF INCOME SPENT ON FOOD:  According to Eva 
Borovska from the Slovak Statistical Office, Slovak households spent 
55.9 percent of their income on food and services in the third 
quarter of 1993, compared with 54.1 percent in the second quarter. 
In the third quarter of the year, Slovak households spent an average 
of Sk1,070 a month per household member on food, beverages, and 
restaurant meals, 15 percent more than in the second quarter, and an 
average of Sk580 a month per household member on services.  Rent and 
communal services represented more than one-half of spending on 
services.  The proportion ranged between 55 percent in farmers' 
households and 69 percent in pensioners' households.  The average 
monthly rent in the third quarter was Sk400.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA 
in Slovak 27 Nov 93 p 4 AU) 

   TRADE MISSION TO SINGAPORE, HONG KONG:  A 15-member group of 
Slovak managers, headed by Peter Mihok, chairman of the Slovak 
Chamber of Commerce and Industry, paid a three-day visit to 
Singapore from 24 to 26 November with the aim of presenting Slovakia 
and exploring possibilities of cooperation with local businessmen 
and financial circles.  It was the first Slovak mission of this kind 
to Singapore.  The Slovak managers departed on 26 November for their 
next destination, Hong Kong.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 27 Nov 
93 p 5 AU) 

   MINISTRY CRITICIZES FRAGMENTATION OF CAPITAL MARKET: 
Representative5 of the Slovak Ministry of Finance are dissatisfied 
with the "uncalled for diversification (fragmentation) of trade in 
securities" in Slovakia.  They believe that the existence of three 
different prices for securities -- at the Bratislava Securities 
Exchange (BCPB), the Bratislava Futures Exchange (BOB), and at the 
RM-System electronic market -- is harmful, given the small size of 
the capital market.  R. Vochyan of the BOB proposes the integration 
of the BCPB and the BOB.  Initially, they could form a joint 
umbrella body to coordinate the activity of the two exchanges, 
Vochyan says, before completely merging after about six months. 
BCPB representatives view the prospect of a merger within six months 
"skeptically'' and believe that "the merger will occur much later, 
if it takes place at all."  (Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 27 Nov 93 p 
2 AU) 

   VISA FEE CHANGES SEEN HURTING TOURISM:  According to NARODNA 
OBRODA commentator Jan Blazej, the new law on administrative fees 
recently passed by the Slovak Parliament abolishes the Sk200 short- 
term visa for tourists and raises the price of a regular visa from 
Sk1,000 to Sk1,500.  Although Blazej admits that most European 
visitors no longer require a visa to visit Bratislava, the visa duty 
still applies to the citizens of countries such as Canada, Japan, 
Australia, Korea, and South Africa.  According to Blazej, the 
abolition of the short-term visa has already prompted some foreign 
tour operators to drop Bratislava from their itineraries.  Blazej 
fears that the new ruling will affect, in particular, the three- to 
four-hour Bratislava stopovers of Danube cruise vessels.  He 
suggests that, while neighboring countries are reducing the prices 
of tourist services to attract more foreign visitors, Slovakia is 
"discouraging" foreigners from visiting the country.  (Bratislava 
NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 29 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   INTRODUCTION OF NEW CURRENCY COMPLETED:  A new 500 Slovak koruna 
(Sk) bill, which features a portrait of Ludovit Stur, was put into 
circulation on 15 November.  With the introduction of this banknote, 
the Slovak National Bank has replaced all federal paper money.  The 
old, stamped federal 500-koruna bills will remain valid until 10 
January 1994 and can be exchanged in banks until 31 March 1994. 
(Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 13 Nov 93 p 5; Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 15 Nov 93 p 3 AU) 

   ESTIMATED COST OF ENVIRONMENTAL CLEANUP:  Lubomira Zimanova, 
state secretary at the Slovak Ministry of Environment, told the 
Slovak news agency TA SR that 55 percent of the Slovak population 
lived in an "unhealthy environment," of which 41 percent lived in an 
extremely harmful" environment.  She estimated the cost of 
eliminating the accumulated environmental problems at Sk120 billion. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 15 Nov 93 p 3 AU) 

   ECONOMIC FORECAST FOR 1994:  According to a preliminary forecast 
prepared by the Forecasting Institute of the Slovak Academy of 
Sciences, gross national product can be expected to drop by 3-4 
percent in 1994.  The development of unemployment "is not likely to 
be dramatic" next year, and the unemployment rate will probably not 
exceed 17 percent.  State budget revenues should become more even 
next year as problems caused by this year's currency split and the 
introduction of new taxation laws will not repeat themselves.  This 
was announced by Juraj Rencko from the Forecasting Institute's 
Macroeconomic Analysis Section.  The forecast will be published in 
mid-January 1994.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 15 Nov 93 p 
2 AU) 

   FEWER PRIVATE BUSINESSMEN:  Some 284,500 private businessmen were 
active in the Slovak Republic at the end of September 1993, 
according to an analysis prepared by the Slovak Statistical Office. 
The number of private businessmen has thus dropped by 16,1 00, or 
5.4 percent, since the beginning of the year.  According to Finance 
Ministry data, the private sector is responsible for 28.6 percent of 
Slovakia's gross domestic product.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
in Slovak 15 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   CORN, POTATO HARVEST RESULTS:  According to the latest estimates 
of the Slovak Statistical Office, based on data available as of 15 
October, 674,500 tons of grain corn have been harvested in Slovakia 
this year, 1,3,00 tons less than a year ago.  The harvest of late 
potatoes amounted to 807,900 tons, 221,400 tons more than in 1992. 
This year's average per hectare potato harvest, 19.5 tons, exceeded 
last year's average by 6.52 tons.  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in 
Slovak 15 Nov 93 p 9 AU) 

   CORN EXCHANGE BEGINS TO QUOTE PRICES:  On 16 November, the Slovak 
Corn Exchange (SPB) started to publish on a regular basis the prices 
of key agricultural commodities, including wheat, corn, and 
slaughter animals.  The SPB hopes that its price quotations will 
play an important economic role and will help stabilize prices. 
(Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 17 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   AEROFLOT EXPANDS MOSCOW-BRATISLAVA FLIGHTS:  The Slovak Ministry 
of Transportation, Communications, and Public Works announced on 16 
November that Aeroflot would expand the number of Moscow-Bratislava 
Moscow flights.  So far, Aeroflot has been flying to Bratislava on 
Mondays and Thursdays.  As of 23 November, Aeroflot will add a 
Tuesday flight to its schedule.  The permission to operate the extra 
MoscowBratislava-Moscow flight has been granted to Aeroflot until 
31 March 1994.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 17 Nov 93 p 2 
AU) 

   AUSTRIANS ACQUIRE MAJORITY IN SLOVAK BANK:  The Austrian 
Raiffeisenbank will become the majority shareholder in the Slovak 
Tatra Banka.  The Raiffeisenbank had held 45 percent of Tatra's 
capital stock, with the three other major shareholders -- Slovenska 
Statna Poistovna (Slovak State Insurance Company), Slovenska Statna 
Sporitelna (Slovak State Savings Bank), and Vseobecna Uverova Banka 
(General Credit Bank), each holding 11.2 percent of the bank's 
shares.  Two of the three Slovak shareholders have sold their shares 
to the Raiffeisenbank, which, for its part, will sell between 15 and 
20 percent of its stake to the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD).  Even after the EBRD's entry, Raiffeisenbank 
will retain 51 percent of Tatra's shares.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 17 Nov 93 p 1 AU) 

   SALE OF MILK PROCESSOR TO AUSTRIAN COMPANY CANCELED:  At its 
meeting on 16 November, the Slovak Government canceled government 
resolution No. 486 of 26 May 1992 on the direct sale of 33 percent 
of the shares of the Milex Nitra a.s., a milk processor, to the 
Austrian Schaerdinger Milch A.G.  Under the privatization project 
approved by the former Slovak Government, the Austrian company was 
to pay 86 million korunas for the Milex shares.  Because the 
Austrian partner did not accept the price laid down in the 
government resolution, no contract could be signed.  A new 
privatization project for Milex Nitra will now have to be approved. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 17 Nov 93 p 5 AU) 

   PUBLIC FAVORS HYDROELECTRIC POWER:  More than half of Slovak 
citizens would prefer hydroelectricity over other forms of energy 
production in the future, according to the results of an opinion 
poll carried out among 1,228 people by the Slovak Statistical 
Office.  Hydroelectric power plants were preferred by 55 percent of 
the respondents, alternative methods of production by 17 percent, 
gas power plants by 7 percent, nuclear power plants by 6 percent, 
thermal power plants by 2 percent, and the import of electrical 
energy from abroad by 2 percent.  Eleven percent of those polled did 
not give an opinion.  According to the Statistical Office, those 
without an opinion on this issue are mainly people over 60 years of 
age (20 percent), high-school graduates (19 percent), supporters of 
the Christian Democratic Movement (KDH) (22 percent), women (15 
percent), and those with no interest in environmental protection (34 
percent).  (Prague CTK in English 17 Nov 93 AU) 

   ASSEMBLY OF VW PASSATS:  The Bratislava subsidiary of the German 
Volkswagen (VW) concern will assemble 3,000 VW Passat automobiles 
this year.  They will be marketed in Slovakia, the Czech Republic, 
and elsewhere in Europe.  The number of VW Passats assembled in 
Bratislava will increase to 5,000 in 1994.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 18 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SLOVAK BANKS' PROBLEMS:  The Slovak National Bank does not 
provide any refinancing credits and only state treasury bills and 
various forms of bonds are subject to interbank trading in Slovakia, 
L. Kovacik, director of the Kosice branch of the Czech Bohemia Bank, 
told the Prague daily RUDE PRAVO.  The situation of businessmen in 
Slovakia is very complicated, Kovacik said, noting that Bohemia was 
the only bank in Kosice providing credits.  The other banks in 
Kosice "declared a moratorium on credits at the beginning of the 
year or stopped lending money in June or July," Kovacik said. 
However, even from Bohemia only short-term credits are available. 
They carry an interest rate of 23 percent, which Kovacik does not 
consider "exaggerated,'' in view of the expected 30 percent 
inflation this year.  According to Kovacik, "the acquisition of 
primary resources is a big problem" for Slovak banks because "Slovak 
citizens do not trust Slovak banks, which is demonstrated by the 
great demand for Czech korunas." (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 2 Nov 
93 p 9 AU) 

   TELEPHONE SYSTEM MODERNIZATION:  According to Vladimir Ondrovic, 
general director of the Slovenske Telekomunikacie (Slovak 
Telecommunications) state enterprise, there are approximately 
870,000 telephones in Slovakia at present, or about 16.5 per 100 
inhabitants.  Only Bratislava, with 45 telephones per 100 
inhabitants, comes close to the European standard, but only in 
quantity and not in quality.  The number of telephones in Slovakia 
is to double by the year 2000 with the help of foreign credits; all 
the new telephone lines will be digitalized.  On 2 November, the 
Slovenske Telekomunikacie state enterprise signed a 620-million- 
Slovak koruna (Sk) contract with Alcatel SEL TLH Liptovsky Mikulas, 
a joint German-Slovak venture, for the delivery of Alcatel 1,000 S 
12 digitalized telephone exchanges, which will make it possible to 
provide about 83,000 subscribers with good quality telephone 
services.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 3 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   BALANCE OF PAYMENTS DEFICIT WITH CZECH REPUBLIC:  The Slovak 
Republic had a deficit of approximately Sk1.75 billion on its 
clearing account with the Czech Republic at the end of October. 
According to data provided by the Slovak Banking Clearing Center, 
the Slovak Republic's liabilities on the so-called old account, for 
payments preceding the currency split, have reached the sum of 
Sk1.077 billion and its liabilities on the new account, for payments 
after the currency split, the sum of Sk640 million.  (Bratislava SME 
in Slovak 3 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   BRATISLAVA-MUNICH AIR LINK:  Eurowings, a German regional 
airline, started to operate a Bratislava-Munich route on 4 November. 
Flights will operate Monday to Friday, using a 46-seat ATR-42 turbo- 
prop aircraft.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 5 Nov 93 p 2 
AU) 

   INCOME FROM TOURISM:  Income from tourism amounted to $89.3 
million in the first six months of 1993.  This was 1.6 percent of 
Slovakia's gross domestic product and 0.3 percent more than in the 
first half of 1992.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Nov 93 p 1 
AU) 

   STATE PROFITS FROM WITHDRAWAL OF BANKNOTES:  The Slovak National 
Bank made a net profit of Sk1.16 billion from the withdrawal of 
stamped 1,000-koruna bills at the end of October.  The bank had 
issued Sk16.558 billion in stamped 1,000 koruna bills but only 
Sk15.427 billion worth of these bills were returned to it by 5 
November 1993, the set deadline.  The remaining bills are either in 
citizens' mattresses or in foreign banks.  (Bratislava SMENA in 
Slovak 11 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   FOREIGN MINISTER VISITS JAPAN:  During their talks with Slovak 
Foreign Minister Jozef Moravcik in Tokyo on 11 November, 
representative5 of the Japanese company Jazaki Corporation confirmed 
their intention to found a joint venture with the Slovak company 
Tesla Prievidza.  Jazaki Corporation ranks among the world's top 
producers of electrical equipment for cars.  Moravcik, who came to 
Japan on November 9 on a four-day official visit, also visited 
Kyoto, where he met with representative5 of the local Chamber for 
Trade and Industry.  At the talks, both sides showed interest in 
broadening economic cooperation and trade between Slovakia and 
Japan.  (Prague CTK in English 11 Nov 93 AU) 

ELAG/29 December/ECONF/East Europe Division/PF 03/2029z Jan 

